Recently Downloaded
Close
x
Filter By Age
Filter By Age Group
0 - 5 years old
Early Years
5 - 6 years old
Infants
6 - 7 years old
First Class
7 - 8 years old
Second Class
8 - 9 years old
Third Class
9 - 10 years old
Fourth Class
10 - 11 years old
Fifth Class
11 - 14 years old
Sixth Class
14+ years old
Secondary
x
Membership
Membership
Individual
Click here to see our price plans for individual memberships
School & Organisations
If your School or Organisation is looking for a Twinkl Membership then get in touch here
Sign In
Join for FREE
Home
Ari Ai Tool
ROI Resources
Create
<
>
Legal
Privacy policy
A message from Jon Seaton, Twinkl's CEO, about our commitment to your security and privacy.
At Twinkl, your trust means
everything
to us. That’s why we respect your privacy, protect it with commercial encryption and ensure that there are strict policies that govern how all data is handled.
We believe in telling you up front exactly what’s going to happen to your personal information and asking for your permission before you share it with us. And if you change your mind later, we make it easy to stop sharing with us. When we do ask to use your data, it’s to provide you with a better user experience and to be even more helpful to you.
Our business model is very straightforward: we sell beautifully designed and unique products, and we rely on you to purchase from us. We don’t build a profile based on your web browsing habits to sell to advertisers. Our website and services are designed to make the site experience and our teaching materials, better. Plain and simple.
Our commitment to protecting your privacy comes from the fact that Twinkl is a unique business – driven by educators, for all those who teach. We know that your trust doesn’t come easily. That’s why we have and always will work as hard as we can to earn and keep it.
We ask that you continue to support and promote our hard work and beautiful teaching materials and we will continue to support you in every way we can.
We care about you.
We care about the children you teach and the path that education is taking. We’re here to support and fight with you in every step of that journey – that’s our promise.
Jon
We ask that you read this Privacy Policy carefully as it contains important details about what personal data Twinkl Ltd. (also referred to as "we," "us" or "our") collects and processes when you use our services, including the choices we offer you to access, maintain and control it.
1. Your Twinkl Account and Service Data
1.1. When you register for and use our services or sign up to our competitions or free giveaways, we will collect and process your personal data, supplied by you, in order to be able to provide our services, competitions, giveaways, prizes and gifts to you.  Below is a table to inform you clearly of:
What personal data we collect on registration;
The purposes for processing;
The lawful basis for processing;
Data Collected
Purpose for Processing
Lawful Basis of Processing
Email address
To manage registration, perform account management and provide customer services
To identify you within our services and service usage
Administrative (i.e. financial, legal and regulatory compliance)
To contact you about products, events, services, feedback, prizes, gifts and free giveaways
Security
Contractual obligation, legal obligation, consent and legitimate interest
Username
To manage registration, perform account management and provide customer services
To identify you within our services and service usage
Administrative (i.e. financial, legal and regulatory compliance)
Security
Contractual obligation, legal obligation and legitimate interest
Password
Security
Contractual obligation, legal obligation and legitimate interest
Country
To manage registration, perform account management and provide customer services
Administrative (i.e. financial, legal and regulatory compliance)
To provide service personalisation and service improvement
Contractual obligation, legal obligation and legitimate interest
Occupation
To provide service personalisation and service improvement
Legitimate interest
1.2. We may also collect additional personal data if you supply it to us, become a paid subscriber or contact us. The consequences of not supplying this personal data may be that you cannot benefit from all of the services that you have signed up for, or that the services we provide to you will not be as customised, effective or secure. Below is a table to inform you clearly of:
What personal data we may collect;
The purposes for processing;
The lawful basis for processing;
Data Collected
Processing Purpose
Lawful Basis of Processing
First and Last Name
Provide a delivery service for goods purchased, record keeping & prevention of crime
Service personalisation and service improvement
Security
To contact you about products, events, services, prizes, gifts and free giveaways
Contractual obligation and consent
Full Address
Provide a delivery service for goods purchased, prizes won and free gifts
Record keeping & prevention of crime
Service personalisation and service improvement
Security
To contact you about products, events and services
Contractual obligation and consent
Phone number
Customer services
Security
To contact you about products, events and services
Consent
Gender
Service personalisation and service improvement
Security
Consent
Date of Birth
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Profile Information
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
County
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Name of Workplace
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Type of Workplace
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Enquiry and Correspondence Data
Customer services
Account management
To offer, market and promote products, events and services
Legitimate interests
Publishing Data
(i.e. your posts and comments on our website)
To enable the publication of comments, reviews and posts on our Website
Consent
Transactional Data
(i.e. your payments)
To process information on your purchases or supply of goods.
To provide good administration
Business reporting
Contractual obligation and legitimate interest
‘Create’ Resource Data
Customer service
To enable the creation of pictorial, photographic and word-based resources by you.
Contractual and legitimate interest
Child's name
To provide personalised educational content and resource recommendations
Consent: Parents/Guardians provide consent, to agree to the collection and use of their child’s personal information for the stated purposes.
Legitimate Interests: Twinkl has a legitimate interest in processing this data to enhance the educational experience by offering personalised content tailored to the child’s needs.
Child's age
To provide personalised educational content and resource recommendations
Consent: Parents/Guardians provide consent, to agree to the collection and use of their child’s personal information for the stated purposes.
Legitimate Interests: Twinkl has a legitimate interest in processing this data to enhance the educational experience by offering personalised content tailored to the child’s needs.
1.3. Where legitimate interest is the lawful basis of processing your personal data, the legitimate interests we are pursuing are as follows: -
Providing you any products or services you have requested;
Analysing your use and measuring the effectiveness of our services to better understand how they are being used so we can improve them and engage and retain users;
Sending you information about our products, events and services, special offers and similar information (where your consent is not required);
To enable and support our recruitment of employees and sub-contractors;
Analysing your use of our services and interaction with our communications, to tailor and customize our services and marketing communications;
Diagnosing problems in our services;
Conducting surveys and market research about our customers, their interests, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and customer satisfaction (unless we need consent to undertake such surveys, in which case we will only do this with your permission);
Investigating and responding to any comments or complaints that you may send us;
In connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory and investigative purposes as necessary (including disclosure of information in connection with legal process or litigation).
1.4. Where contractual and legal obligations are the lawful basis of processing your personal data, the consequence of failing to provide your personal data will be that we are unable to provide our service to you.
1.5 We may process information relating to you where this has been provided by an employer or through our online school referral service. To illustrate, your employer may have provided us with your work contact details so that we can communicate with you and set up your school account; or your email may have been provided to our school referral service by someone who thought our service may be of interest to you and your school. In each case, we will provide you with the appropriate details from where we obtained your personal data in accordance with data protection laws.
1.6 You may provide us with specific information such as your child's name and age. By doing so, you agree that you have the right to provide this information and consent to our processing it. This informaion is used to tailor educational content and resources, ensuring it is age-appropriate and engaging. You may withdraw your consent for this processing.
2. Your Twinkl Service Usage Data
2.1. When you interact and make use of our services, we may capture and process usage data and may use this data to provide rewards and incentives either randomly or as part of a programme and we may publicly publish your success in achieving these rewards or incentives. This data is ultimately processed with the purpose of delivering reliable, secure and accurate services and to consistently enhance, improve and optimise your experience of using our services. We do not sell this data to third parties. Our legal basis for this processing is that of legitimate interest.Examples include: IP address; browser type and version; operating system used; website speed, website navigation paths and actions; and patterns of service use.
3. Sharing Your Personal Data
3.1. We will disclose your personal data to our employees to enable them to process your data.
3.2. Your personal data may also be disclosed to other companies in the Twinkl group, and to our agents, sub-contractors, data processors and suppliers (3rd parties) to enable them to process your personal data on our behalf.
3.2. When we supply any of your personal data to our agents, sub-contractors, data processors and suppliers (3rd parties), we protect your personal data by ensuring reasonable contractual arrangements are in place that stipulate compliance with this Privacy Policy.
3.3 Where your access to our services is granted under a school membership account, we shall, upon request, share your usage data (which shall include your downloads and login data) with the school or organisation that manages the relevant school membership account. This is normally done by providing the information to the Account Administrator of the relevant school membership account.
4. Marketing and Product Preferences
4.1. We may use account, service and usage data to provide you with information about our products and services. Our purpose is to provide you with a service to help meet your needs. Our lawful basis for processing this data is consent. You are free to withdraw your consent at any time. The consequences might be however, that we cannot offer you certain things, such as offers and promotions or resource alerts, which may be beneficial to you.
4.2.  You may change your preferences or opt-out at any time by either accessing ‘Your Contact Preferences’ within your Twinkl account or by unsubscribing from Twinkl marketing emails by using the 'unsubscribe' link at the end of the email received. Please note that as a Twinkl user or subscriber you are unable to unsubscribe from customer service emails (such as service updates) as these are required to provide our service to you and the lawful basis of processing is contractual or legitimate interests depending on the circumstances.
4.3. If you have signed up for a competition or free gift without being a service subscriber, you may opt-out at any time by using the unsubscribe link at the end of the email received.
5. Our Use Of Cookies and Stored Device Data
Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer by websites that you visit. They are widely used in order to make websites work, or work more efficiently, as well as to provide information to the owners of the site.
5.1 The Twinkl website uses cookies and stored device data for the following purposes:
Necessary Cookies
: Cookies to ensure the correct technical functionality of the services we provide and you have requested, customise your experience and tailor it to your preferences, optimise global performance, maintain website security, prevent website abuse and ensure legislative/regulatory compliance.
Analytics Cookies
: Cookies that allow us to to use 3rd party services to compile and enrich business data regarding website traffic and activity - for example,
Google Analytics
and
Microsoft Clarity
, to help us to understand our most popular website pages, visit sources and time-of-day traffic. Further, to advertise Twinkl services to you across our website and on 3rd party websites - for example, to market and
remarket Twinkl products and services to you using Google Adwords
.
5.2 To withdraw consent for the use of non-neccesary cookies opt-out via the consent mechanism (globe menu) and/or configure your browser to block cookies. Our website features may not function correctly and/or you may not receive the best website experience if you disable/do not consent to the use of cookies.
5.3 Except as set out at 5.5, below, we use Adwords re-marketing to attract you back to our website with content that may be of interest to you. To do this we advertise using Google search and Google recommended websites. Google may use cookies to track your activity and show you adverts that may be of interest to you and they use this data to show you relevant messages. You are able to opt out of Google using cookies by visiting https://support.google.com/adwords/answer/1752338 and https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated - opting-out of cookies on the Twinkl Website will prevent Google's tracking scripts from running whilst you are using the Twinkl website.
5.4 We use the
reCAPTCHA v3
service provided by
Google
Inc. (Google). This checks if you are a real person in order to prevent spam and abuse of our website when you request our services. Use of reCAPTCHA v3 is subject to Google's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.
5.5 Third-party analytics are
neither collected nor used
at any time: a) when a Learner is logged in to Twinkl Learner Login; or b) on the log-in pages for Learner Login/Twinkl Go.
6. How We Protect Your Personal Data
6.1. We have put in place a number of security procedures and technical organisational measures to safeguard your personal data. These measures are reviewed regularly and updated when necessary in order for us to meet business needs and in accordance with changes in technology and regulatory requirements.
Examples of procedures and technical and organisational measures:
We train and take steps to ensure our employees operate in accordance with our information security policies, procedures and applicable contractual conditions.
We have measures in place to protect against accidental loss and unauthorised access, use, destruction or disclosure of data. Some examples are: staff screening, encryption and hashing; firewalling and content filtering; virus/malware scanning and protection; vulnerability scanning; multi-factor authentication; pseudonymization; logging, monitoring, inventory and auditing; secure design; privacy impact assessments, physical security controls; system authentication/role-based access control, high availability configuration and regular backups.
We have a business continuity and disaster recovery strategy that is designed to safeguard the continuity of Twinkl’s service and to protect you and your data.
6.2. We will use all reasonable efforts to safeguard your personal data. However, you should be aware that the use of the Internet is not entirely secure and for this reason we cannot guarantee the security or integrity of any personal data which is transferred from you or to you via the Internet.
7. Overseas Transfers
7.1. The personal data you provide may be transferred to countries outside the United Kingdom and the European Economic Area ('EEA') that do not have similar protections in place regarding your data and restrictions on its use as set out in this Privacy Policy. However, transfers outside of the UK and EEA will be protected by us imposing appropriate safeguards, namely the use of standard data protection clauses adopted or approved by the European Commission to ensure the security of your data or via, independent privacy schemes approved by regulators.
7.2. The EEA comprises the EU member states plus Norway, Iceland and Liechtenstein. By submitting your data, you consent to these transfers for the purposes specified above.
8. Your Rights Under Applicable Data Protection Law
8.1. Your rights in respect to how we process your personal data are set out in the table below. Please note that some of these rights only apply in certain circumstances.
Your rights
Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) Guidance
The right to be informed about the collection and use of your personal data.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-be-informed/
The right to have inaccurate personal data rectified or completed if it is incomplete.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-rectification/
The right to have your personal data erased in certain circumstances.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-erasure/
The right to object to the processing of personal data in certain circumstances.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-object/
The right to request the restriction or suppression of your personal data
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-restrict-processing/
The right to access your personal data.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-of-access/
The right to obtain and reuse your personal data for your own purpose across different services.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-data-portability/
The right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In the UK, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office.
https://ico.org.uk/make-a-complaint/
8.2. We respect and value your right to access and control your data. You can exercise your rights, subject to appropriate identity verification procedures, in the following ways:
- By amending your data or consent within your Service account area;
- By contacting our
TwinklCares
customer services team using httlis://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us;
- By sending a letter to The Data Protection Officer, Twinkl Global HQ, Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom
8.3. We take your rights seriously and want you to feel confident that we are handling your personal data responsibly and in line with good practice. You can seek further information, or raise a concern to us using any of the following ways:
By contacting our
TwinklCares
customer services team using https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us;
By sending a letter to The Data Protection Officer, Twinkl Global HQ, Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom
9. Data Retention
9.1. We retain personal data for as long as we reasonably require it for legal or business purposes. When determining data retention periods, we take into consideration applicable laws, contractual obligations and the expectations and requirements of our customers. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or destroy it.
9.2. If you have signed up for competitions and/or free giveaways and are not registered for and use our services, data will be retained for 30 days after the prizes or giveaways have been dispatched unless you have consented to being contacted for more information on Twinkl services or for receiving marketing emails.
10. Sale Of Business
10.1. If Twinkl Ltd. is sold or integrated with another business your personal data may be disclosed to our advisers, or any prospective purchasers and their advisers, and will be passed on to the new owners of the business.
11. Your Consent
11.1. By using or interacting with our service, or by signing up to competitions and free giveaways, you are consenting to:
the use of cookies and other technologies;
the transfer of your data outside of the country where you live;
the transfer of your data outside of the European Economic Area;
the collection, use, sharing, and other processing of your information as described in this Privacy Policy.
11.2. In each case, you consent to the processing of data by Twinkl Ltd., as data controller. If you don't agree with the terms of this Privacy Policy, then please don't use our service.
11.3. Where the lawful basis of processing your data is consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. To withdraw your consent, please contact our Data Protection Officer using the details below.
12. How do we use social media?
12.1 We may use social media and social networking services for promoting our business, communicating with you and supporting the teaching community. In order to do this, we require the use of third party service providers, such as Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, Instagram, and YouTube.
12.2 Our social media pages, groups, feeds and channels are administered by these third parties:
Our Facebook page is administered by Facebook, in accordance with Facebook's Data Policy available
here
, and is accessible by Facebook users who have already consented to Facebook's Data Policy.
Our Twitter account is administered by Twitter, in accordance with Twitter's Privacy Policy available
here
.
Our Instagram account is administered by Instagram in accordance with Instagram’s Privacy Policy available
here
.
Our YouTube channel is administered by YouTube, in accordance with their privacy policy available
here
.
Our LinkedIn page is administered by LinkedIn, in accordance with their privacy policy available
here
.
12.3 We may message you directly through social media when you contact us through these platforms. Our lawful basis is that of consent..
12.4 We may export your social media profile information or content (such as your name or social media username) to our own systems if there is a reasonable need to do so. This could include exporting an individual’s name and social media username to our systems in order to review and record whether they have broken our social media page or group rules. Our purpose is to effectively manage our social media platforms and ensure that they are managed in accordance with our social media group and page rules. Our lawful grounds are based on legitimate interests. Our legitimate interests are to protect our business, employees, sub-contractors and followers.
Protecting our Intellectual Property Rights
12.5 In order to protect our intellectual property, our brand and business, we may collect or use your personal details where we have reason to believe that you or any organisation you represent is infringing on our intellectual property rights. We may obtain your personal details from:-
you or your organisation’s website or social media profiles,
Companies House,
The Charities Commission,
The Intellectual Property Office,
Other public body,
Social media,
Any other publicly listed source.
12.6 Your details may be provided by other third parties including other organisations, Twinkl users, social media users or members of the general public.
12.7 We may use your personal information to:-
review any potential infringement of our intellectual property;
provide you with a cease and desist communication;
take legal action or notify a third party that our intellectual property rights are being infringed.
12.8 Our lawful grounds are based on legitimate interest. Our legitimate interest is to protect our business.
13. Identify and Contact Details of the Data Controller and Data Protection Officer
13.1. Twinkl Ltd. of Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW is the Data Controller. You can contact the Data Controller using a variety of methods found here: https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us. Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted at the address of the Data Controller or by email at
dpo@twinkl.co.uk
.
13.2. Alternatively, for individuals based in the EEA our Designated Representative is: Twinkl Ireland and can be contacted at Ground Floor 8-9 Marino Mart Fairview, Clontarf, Dublin 3, Ireland or by email at
TwinklRepresentative@twinkl.co.uk
.
14. Changes to this Policy
14.1. We keep this policy under regular review. If we change the content of our Privacy Policy we will post the changes on this page.
Copyright
By downloading any resources from Twinkl (whether free or Premium), you agree to the following:
You may use resources for personal and/or direct classroom use only.
In order to support us, we ask that you always acknowledge www.twinkl.co.uk as the source of the resource. If you love our resources, why not let others know about Twinkl?
You must not reproduce or share this resource with others in any form. You may not use your account to download and print for anyone else, as this breaches the account usage licence.
You must not host or in any other way share our resources directly with others, without the prior written permission of Twinkl's CEO.
You must not use any product for commercial purposes and also you must not alter the digital versions of our products in any way.
You must not use any product or resource to train, validate, test, or otherwise model any artificial intelligence application, or upload any product or resource to any such system or platform.
You acknowledge that the product you download will remain the property of Twinkl Ltd at all times and you agree to our general site Terms and Conditions.
If you have any questions about our copyright policy, or to discuss any of the above, please email us:
copyright@twinkl.co.uk
.
Please note that we take the copying of any part of our resources
very seriously
, given that we invest heavily in our team to produce the highest quality resources.
Terms and Conditions
Last revised on 29th July 2024
These user terms and conditions ("Terms and Conditions) may be updated by Us from time to time without notice to You. We will post any revisions to these Terms and Conditions on this page and We will also indicate at the top of this page the date that these Terms and Conditions were last revised.
By browsing and using www.twinkl.co.uk - or any Twinkl geographical domain - (the 'Website' which shall include the placing of orders and subscriptions), You are agreeing to comply with and be bound by the following Terms and Conditions of use, which govern the relationship between You and Twinkl Limited.
Your use of the service or this Website after any revisions have been made constitutes Your acceptance of the new Terms and Conditions. If You do not agree to abide by these or any new Terms and Conditions, do not use or access (or continue to use or access) the service or this Website. It is Your responsibility to regularly check this page to determine if there have been changes to these Terms and Conditions and to consider such changes.
You should print a copy of these Terms and Conditions for future reference and You should also regularly revisit the Terms and Conditions on the Website for purposes of noting whether or not revisions have been made.
Who we are
1.1 Twinkl is the trading name of Twinkl Limited of Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom. Twinkl Limited is registered in England and Wales under company no. 07201458.
1.2. The term "Twinkl", "We" and "Us", shall mean Twinkl Limited, the owner of this Website. The term "You", "Yourself" and "Your" refers to the user or viewer of this Website.
1.3. Twinkl is the Data Controller within the definition of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
The services
2.1 Twinkl is a provider of high quality teaching resources - we call this the 'Service'. Our resources are primarily distributed through the Website.
2.2 Twinkl sells physical products and we call this the 'Product Service' which is made available through the Website.
2.3 Twinkl provides a range of resource membership services upon payment of a fee as specified on the Website or chargeable in some other way may be purchased. We call this the ‘Membership Service’.
2.4 Twinkl provides a support community forum service and we call this the ‘Forum Service’ which is made available through the Website.
2.5 We reserve the right to change pricing and or availability in respect of any of the services in this clause for any reason and without notice.
2.6 Twinkl is not responsible for non-delivery or technical limitations of the end user for any reason in respect of any of the services in this clause. You are strongly advised to read our
help and support FAQ
.
Member accounts
3.1 Certain aspects of the Services may require You to register and provide information about Yourself. You agree to: (a) provide true, accurate, current and complete information about Yourself as prompted by the relevant registration form contained on the Website (such information being the Registration Data) and (b) maintain and promptly update the Registration Data (by emailing Us) to keep it true, accurate, current and complete and We shall not be liable for any loss suffered by Your non-compliance with this provision.
3.2 Your privacy is incredibly important to us. You can find additional information in our
Privacy Policy
.
3.3 The registration processes will involve You providing a password and We shall provide You with a designated account. You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of the password and account and are fully responsible for all activities that occur under Your password or account. You agree to (a) immediately notify Twinkl of any unauthorised use of Your password or account and any other breach of security, and (b) ensure that You exit from Your account at the end of each session. Twinkl cannot and will not be liable for any loss or damage arising from Your failure to comply with this obligation.
3.4 Your member account is strictly for your personal use only and you may not use your account to download and print for anyone else. Twinkl does not allow volume printing arrangements, unless specifically agreed in writing (these will be individually negotiated).
3.5 Your member account is subject to an acceptable use policy in accordance with the Terms and Conditions. We will monitor and may temporarily restrict accounts which have high download volumes. If your account is subject to investigation due to high downloads under our acceptable use policy, you may contact us to request reactivation of your account. If we consider that your use of the member account is in breach of our Terms and Conditions, we may terminate the agreement in accordance with clause 11.
Delivery of Digital Resources
3.6 All resources available on the Website are digital products and downloadable via digital download only unless otherwise specified. No physical products are shipped for digital resources.
3.7 Downloads of digital resources are made available directly from the Website to signed-in members and are made subject to these terms and conditions.
Your conduct
4.1 You can contribute to Twinkl in a variety of ways, including (but not limited to) the request and create a resource, forum, calendar events, book list suggestions and in addition, on most pages of the Website you are capable of posting comments for lawful, relevant, fair and appropriate opinion. You acknowledge that all information, data (including registration data), text, software, music, sound, photographs, graphics, video, messages and other materials ("Content"), whether publicly posted or privately transmitted, are the sole responsibility of the person from which such Content originated.
4.2 Twinkl accepts no responsibility for, and does not guarantee, the accuracy, integrity or quality of any Content placed on our Website (in any manner specified in Clause 4.1 or otherwise) by you or any third party.
4.3 You acknowledge that by using the Service, there is a risk that you may be exposed to Content that you may find offensive, indecent or objectionable. Please see the section below titled "Content Problems" for details of how to report such Content.
4.4 If you breach these Terms and Conditions, you should be aware that a party aggrieved by the uploading of any content which is, inter alia, defamatory or in breach of copyright, may take action and that this could result in registration data and other data concerning your identity being disclosed and your having to pay compensation to the person or company aggrieved.
4.5 You agree to not use the Service to:
4.5.1 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any Content that is unlawful, harmful, objectionable, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortuous, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically or otherwise discriminatory; harm or attempt to harm minors in any way;
4.5.2 impersonate any person or entity, including, but not limited to, a Twinkl staff member, forum moderator, guide or host, or falsely state or otherwise misrepresent your affiliation with a person or entity;
4.5.3 forge headers or otherwise manipulate identifiers in order to disguise the origin of any Content transmitted through the Service;
4.5.4 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any Content that you do not have a right to transmit under any law or under contractual or fiduciary relationships (such as inside information, proprietary and confidential information learned or disclosed as part of employment relationships or under nondisclosure agreements);
4.5.5 enter into any of our email lists an email address that is not your own where you know (or ought reasonably to know) that the recipient of the email would not wish to be contacted by Us;
4.5.6 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any Content that infringes any patent, trade mark, trade secret, copyright or other proprietary rights ("Rights") of any party;
4.5.7 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any unsolicited or unauthorised advertising, promotional materials, "junk mail," "spam," "chain letters," "pyramid schemes," or any other form of solicitation, except in those areas that are designated for such purpose;
4.5.8 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any material that contains software viruses or any other computer code, files or programs designed to interrupt, damage, destroy or limit the functionality of any computer software or hardware or telecommunications equipment;
4.5.9 disrupt the normal flow of dialogue, cause a screen to "scroll" faster than other users of the Service are able to type, or otherwise act in a manner that negatively affects other users' ability to engage in real time exchanges;
4.5.10 interfere with or disrupt the Service or servers or networks connected to the Service, or disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or regulations of networks connected to the Service;
4.5.11 intentionally or unintentionally violate any applicable law or regulation;
4.5.12 collect or store personal data about other users;
4.5.13 post content which refers to individual schools, colleges or agencies - or their staff - whether by name, or identifiable by a pseudonym or any other means; and/or
4.5.14 advertise any job vacancies in any area of the Website unless We expressly agree that you may do so.
4.6 You acknowledge that Twinkl does not pre-screen Content that you post on the Website, but that Twinkl and people designated by it shall have the right (but not the obligation) to monitor communications that occur through, and posts made to, the Website. If Twinkl determines, in its sole discretion, that you or another user have breached these Terms and Conditions or that any Content is inappropriate or otherwise objectionable, Twinkl may refuse to accept or may remove any Content from the Website, without any liability to you or a third party.
Indemnity
5.1 You agree to indemnify, defend and hold Twinkl Limited and its affiliates harmless from and against any and all liability, losses, costs, claims and expenses incurred directly or indirectly (including reasonable legal fees) incurred in connection with or arising out of your violation of these Terms and Conditions, any applicable law or regulation or the rights of any third parties related to the use of the Content, our Website, Service and tools. This indemnity includes both any liability to third parties, and other costs and losses incurred by Twinkl Limited.
Special warning for international use
6.1 The Website is designed to be compliant with the applicable laws and regulations of England and Wales. Due to the global nature of the Internet, users from all over the world will have access to the Website, however if you are resident in a country outside of the United Kingdom you use the Website at your own risk.
Rights in posted content on the Website
7.1 With respect to all Content you post on the Website, you grant Twinkl Limited a royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, non-exclusive and fully sub-licensable right and licence to use, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create derivative works from, distribute, perform and display such Content (in whole or part) worldwide and/or to incorporate it in other works in any form, media, or technology now known or later developed. With respect to all Content you post to the Website, you hereby waive any moral rights you have in the Content. You agree to perform all further acts necessary to perfect any of the above rights granted by you to Twinkl Limited, including the execution of deeds and documents, at our request.
7.2 You represent and warrant that you own or otherwise control all of the rights to the Content and can grant the rights set out above. You represent, warrant and undertake that: (i) the work submitted is your own (ii) the Content will not infringe the rights of any third parties (including that the Content or material is not defamatory); and (iii) you have obtained all rights and consents that are necessary for you to provide the Content; and (iv) you will immediately remove and notify us of any Content that does not does not comply with these Terms and Conditions or may infringe the rights of third parties. You agree to indemnify Twinkl Limited for all claims brought by a third party against Twinkl Limited in respect of infringement of that third party's intellectual property rights or arising out of or in connection with a breach of any of these warranties. Twinkl Limited reserves the right to refuse to host any content that has been made in the course of business and in any respect, asserts its right to host Content entirely at its own discretion.
Content problems
8.1 If you object to the publication of any material placed in any area of the Website, please let us know by clicking on the 'Report' link next to the relevant post/message. This is the fastest way to notify us and will provide to us a direct link to the post/message in question.
8.2 If you object to anything on the Website, please let us know by sending an email to
help@twinkl.co.uk
and we will take whatever action we deem appropriate.
8.3 Twinkl will always immediately correct content where mistakes are found, but We do not guarantee the accuracy of any content provided, and it is for You to verify and be satisfied with the material you download. Twinkl provides and information service and You accept that We take no responsibility for the way You use the information you download.
General practices regarding use and storage
9.1 You acknowledge that Twinkl may establish general practices and limits concerning use of the Service, including without limitation the maximum number of days that message postings or other uploaded Content will be retained by the Service and the maximum number of times (and the maximum duration for which) you may access the Service in a given period of time.
9.2 You agree that Twinkl has no responsibility or liability for the deletion or failure to store any messages and other communications or other Content maintained or transmitted by the Service.
9.3 You acknowledge that Twinkl reserves the right to de-activate accounts that are inactive for an extended period of time.
9.4 You acknowledge that Twinkl reserves the right to change these general practices and limits at any time, in its sole discretion, with or without notice.
9.5 You agree to use using your usage data to provide rewards and incentives either randomly or as part of a programme and you agree to us publicly publishing your success in achieving these rewards or incentives.
9.6 Any rewards or incentives are provided at Twinkl's discretion and may be added, removed or cancelled at any time for any reason at Twinkl's sole and absolute discretion.
9.7 Any reward or incentive programmes are provided at Twinkl's discretion and may be added, removed or cancelled at any time for any reason at Twinkl's sole and absolute discretion.
9.8 Where your access to the Service is granted under a School Membership account, you agree that we may share your usage data (which shall include your downloads and login data) with the school or organisation that manages the relevant School Membership account. This is normally done by providing the information to the Account Administrator of the relevant School Membership account.
Modifications to service
10.1 Twinkl reserves the right at any time and from time to time to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, the Service (or any part thereof) with or without notice.
10.2 You agree that Twinkl shall not be liable to you or to any third party for any modification, suspension or discontinuance of the Service.
Termination
11.1 You agree that Twinkl, in its sole discretion and without liability to you or any third party, may suspend or terminate, with or without notice, the Website and/or the Service or any part of it or any of your passwords or accounts (or any part(s) thereof or related files and information) within the Service, and may remove and discard any Content within the Service, for any reason, including, without limitation, for lack of use or if Twinkl Limited believes that you have violated or acted inconsistently with the letter or spirit of these Terms and Conditions.
11.2 Where there is a breach of these Terms and Conditions, the rights described in this paragraph are not Twinkl's only remedy and Twinkl may take any other action we reasonably deem appropriate in connection with such breach.
Dealing with advertisers and other suppliers
12.1 Your dealings with advertisers, merchants and any other third party found on or through the Service, including payment and delivery of related goods or services, and any other terms, conditions, warranties or representations associated with such dealings, are solely between you and such third party.
12.2 To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, you agree that: (a) Twinkl Limited shall not be responsible or liable for any loss or damage of any kind incurred as the result of any such dealings or as the result of the presence of such advertisers and merchants on the Service or the Website, and (b) any orders placed by you on, and any product specifications and product availability appearing on, the Service or the Website are subject to confirmation by, and are supplied subject to the terms and conditions of business of, the relevant merchant.
Links to other websites or resources
13.1 The Service may provide, or third parties may provide, links to other websites or resources. As Twinkl has no control over these sites and resources, you acknowledge and agree that Twinkl is not responsible for the availability of such external sites or resources, and does not endorse and is not responsible or liable for any Content, advertising, products, or other materials on or available from such sites or resources.
13.2 You acknowledge and agree that Twinkl shall not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or reliance on any such Content, goods or services available on or through any such site or resource.
Use of Twinkl materials
14.1 All articles, information and other materials presented on the Website are subject to
copyright
, trade mark right and/or other intellectual property right owned by or licensed to Twinkl Limited. You are prohibited from reproducing, extracting, providing links to or otherwise communicating or making available to third parties any part of the content of this Website or any resources therein without Twinkl Limited's written consent. You acknowledge that, by making use of this Website, you are agreeing to comply with this prohibition and that any breach thereof is likely to result in legal proceedings being issued against you.
14.2 For the avoidance of doubt and to make the provision contained in 14.1 clear, you are not permitted to share any Twinkl materials or illustrations on any digital platform of any kind without the prior written consent of Twinkl's CEO.
14.3 You must not use any material downloaded or otherwise sourced from the Website for the purposes of:
14.3.1 training, validating, testing, or modelling of any system which uses artificial intelligence technology; or
14.3.2 rephrasing, rewriting, redesigning, recreating, altering, or otherwise manipulating such material or any part thereof through the use of any system, including any platform or service which uses or incorporates any artificial intelligence technology.
14.4 Such material must not be uploaded or otherwise provided to any artificial intelligence service without Twinkl’s express written permission.
14.5 You acknowledge that all materials You download remain the property of Twinkl Limited in perpetuity.
14.6 Twinkl strictly forbids the use of any scripted or otherwise automated method of content or website access, including but not limited to training any machine learning or artificial intelligence system.
Disclaimers
15.1 You expressly acknowledge and agree that:
15.1.1 The content of the pages of the Website is for your general information and use only. It is subject to change without notice.
15.1.2 Your use of the Service is at your sole risk. Twinkl has made every effort to ensure that the Content on the Website and made available through the Service is accurate and up-to-date and correct at the time of publication. However, the Website and the Service are provided on an 'as is' and 'as available' basis. We do not guarantee the accuracy, timeliness, completeness or fitness for purpose of the Content provided on the Website or through the Service or that use of the Website will be uninterrupted, virus free or error-free. No responsibility is accepted by or on behalf of Twinkl for any errors, omissions or inaccurate information on the Website or available through the Service.
15.1.3 Neither Twinkl nor any third parties provide any warranty or guarantee as to the accuracy, timeliness, performance, completeness or suitability of the information and materials found or offered on the Website for any particular purpose. You acknowledge that such information and materials may contain inaccuracies or errors and we expressly exclude liability for any such inaccuracies or errors to the fullest extent permitted by law.
15.1.4 Unauthorised use of the Website may give rise to a claim for damages and/or be a criminal offence.
15.1.5 From time to time the Website may also include links to other websites. These links are provided for your convenience to provide further information. They do not signify that Twinkl endorses the website(s) and Twinkl has no responsibility for the content of the linked website(s).
15.1.6 The Content on the Website and made available through the Service is for general information only and is not intended to, nor does it, constitute legal or other professional advice or services or a recommendation to purchase any product or service upon which a specific decision should be made. The information, Content of the Website and Service do not address your particular circumstances and accordingly you should not rely upon the Content of the Website or the Service as a substitute for proper professional advice.
15.1.7 Twinkl is not responsible for how the Content on the Website or available through the Service is used, is interpreted or what reliance is placed on it. We do not accept any responsibility for the results of any action taken on the basis of the information provided on the Website or available through the Service. It shall be your own responsibility to ensure that any products, services or information available through this Website meet your specific requirements.
15.1.8 Any material downloaded or otherwise obtained through the use of the Service is done at your own discretion and risk and you will be solely responsible for any damage to your computer system or loss of data that results from the download of any such material.
15.1.9 No advice or information, whether oral or written, obtained by you from Twinkl shall create any warranty or other obligation not expressly stated in these Terms and Conditions.
Availability of the Website
16.1 Twinkl has an excellent record of uptime and availability of the Website. We do not, however, guarantee that the Website will operate continuously without interruptions or be error free and Twinkl therefore accepts no liability for its unavailability.
16.2 You must not attempt to interfere with the proper working of the Website and, in particular, you must not attempt to circumvent security, tamper with, hack into, or otherwise disrupt any computer system, server, Website, router or any other internet connection device.
Limitations of liability
17.1 Twinkl Limited's liability to you in contract, tort (including negligence) with regard to these Terms and Conditions, use of the Website and/or any Service shall be limited the greater of: (a) £150 and (b) the price paid by you to Twinkl Limited under any Contract during the 3 months preceding the event giving rise to the claim.
17.2 You expressly acknowledge and agree that Twinkl Limited shall not be liable for any indirect, incidental, special, consequential or exemplary damages, nor for direct or indirect loss of profits revenue, business, anticipated savings, goodwill, opportunity, reputation, business interruption, use, data or intangible losses even if Twinkl Limited has been advised of the possibility of such damage.
17.3 Nothing in these Terms and Conditions shall affect the statutory rights of any consumer or exclude or restrict any liability for fraud or for death or personal injury arising from the negligence of Twinkl Limited.
Events outside of our control
18.1 Twinkl will not be liable or responsible for any failure to perform, or delay in performance of, any of our obligations under these Terms and Conditions or any Contract that is caused by events outside our reasonable control ("Force Majeure Event"). A Force Majeure Event includes any act, event, non-happening, omission or accident beyond our reasonable control and includes in particular (without limitation) the following:
18.1.1 Strikes, lock-outs or other industrial action.
18.1.2 Civil commotion, riot, invasion, terrorist attack or threat of terrorist attack, war (whether declared or not) or threat or preparation for war.
18.1.3 Fire, explosion, storm, flood, earthquake, subsidence, epidemic or other natural disaster.
18.1.4 Impossibility of the use of railways, shipping, aircraft, motor transport or other means of public or private transport.
18.1.5 Impossibility of the use of public or private telecommunications networks.
18.1.6 The acts, decrees, legislation, regulations or restrictions of any government.
18.1.7 Viruses and cyber attacks
18.1.8 Power or other failure affecting any part of our servers, premises or any other part of our service
18.2 Twinkl Limited's performance under any Terms and Conditions or any Contract is deemed to be suspended for the period that the Force Majeure Event continues, and we will have an extension of time for performance during that period. We will use our reasonable endeavours to bring the Force Majeure Event to a close or to find a solution by which our obligations under the Terms and Conditions or any Contract may be performed despite the Force Majeure Event.
Twinkl Membership for Individuals
19.1 The Twinkl Membership Service is subject to these Terms and Conditions and in an addition the following conditions shall apply to this service:
19.1.1 Twinkl makes available the Membership Service by way of a subscription to You upon payment of a fee as specified from time to time on the Website.
19.1.2 In accordance with the general Terms and Conditions, Your user and account username and password will not be shared with anyone.
19.1.3 In accordance with our
Copyright Terms
, You will not redistribute any resources downloaded through the Membership Service and You understand that any resources You download from the Website whether through the Membership Service or otherwise are for Your personal use only.
19.1.4 You have explicitly read and agree to abide by the Twinkl
Copyright Terms
.
19.1.5 You understand and agree to the Membership Service Acceptable Use Policy, as detailed in clause 20.
19.1.6 You agree that a breach of any of the general Terms and Conditions will lead to Your access to the Membership Service being immediately suspended. It is at Twinkl's absolute discretion as to whether Your account will be reinstated.
19.1.7 You understand and agree that We will monitor Your usage of the Service to allow us to determine whether a violation has, or is, occurring.
19.1.8 A subscription to the Membership Service can only be purchased directly from Twinkl by (1) paying a monthly subscription fee; (“Monthly Subscriptions”) or (2) pre-payment giving You access to the Twinkl Membership Service for a specific time period (“Pre-Paid Subscriptions”). Twinkl retains the absolute right at their complete discretion to offer Monthly Subscriptions in certain countries for certain periods of time or Pre-Paid Subscriptions in certain countries for certain periods of time.
19.1.9 When You register for the Twinkl Membership Service, You consent to get access to Twinkl Membership Service immediately.
19.1.10 For the purposes of this clause 19,
‘access premium content
’ means access, via download or access via the Twinkl website or apps, any content which Twinkl makes available only to users of the Membership Service, including, but not limited to: a) downloading any resource(s); b) use of Twinkl Go; c) use of Twinkl Symbols; d) use of any AI tool; and d) use of Learner Login.
19.1.11 You may cancel your subscription for the Membership Service at your convenience by
contacting the Twinkl Cares team
.
Your refund options and how long you'll have access to the Membership Service after cancellation are as follows:
Monthly Subscriptions
Criteria
Refund
Membership Service (including access)
Active free trial promotional pricing offer
NA
Ends on expiry of the free trial promotional pricing period
Cancelled
within
14 days
of first monthly payment; and
Not accessed premium content
Yes - Full refund
Ends on the date of cancellation
14+ days after first monthly payment
No
Ends after expiry of the current billing period
Pre-Paid Subscriptions
Criteria
Refund
Membership Service (including access)
Active free trial promotional pricing offer; and
Not accessed premium content
NA
Ends on expiry of the free trial promotional pricing period
Cancelled
within
30 days
of sign-up; and
Not accessed premium content
Yes - Full refund
Ends on the date of cancellation
Cancelled
within
the first calendar month
of sign-up
Yes - Full refund minus fees paid for the current billing period
Ends at the end of the current calendar month
Cancelled
after the first calendar month, but before the end of the second calendar month
after sign-up
Yes - For fees paid in respect of the period after the current calendar month
Ends at the end of the current calendar month
Cancelled
after the second calendar month
No
Ends at the end of the annual billing period
19.1.12 You acknowledge that by accessing premium content, you are waiving your right to a 14-day cooling-off period under regulation 29(1) of the Consumer Contracts Regulations 2013. This means that you will not be entitled to a refund once you have accessed premium content using the Membership Service.
19.1.13 In relation to Monthly Subscriptions, You will be charged the rate stated at the time of purchase, every month until You or We cancel it. Any download limits referred to at point of purchase will expire at the end of your current month's term of membership. The limit will refresh when the next payment is made. Any limits implied bear no influence on the terms of our Acceptable Use Policy as detailed in Clause 20.
19.1.14 In relation to a Pre-Paid (Annual) Subscription, You will be charged at the time of purchase the equivalent monthly rate stated at the time of purchase multiplied by 12 (the 'Minimum Term'). At the end of the Minimum Term, Your Membership Service contract will, at our sole and absolute discretion, either renew automatically for another 12 months until You or We cancel it or it will not automatically renew and Your access to the Membership Service will cease until You take the actions prescribed by Us to renew Your Membership Service.  If Your Membership Service renews automatically, at the end of Your first Minimum Term We may charge You, at our sole and absolute discretion, the rate You paid when You first subscribed to the Membership Service or the then current annual rate for the Membership Service level you have access to. If You renew Your Membership Service before the end of the Minimum Term, Your renewed Membership Service will be extended to include, if any, the months which were remaining on your previous Membership Service Subscription.
19.1.15 Twinkl may change the price for the Monthly Subscriptions and Pre-Paid Subscriptions and we will communicate this change to you either at renewal, or in respect of Monthly Subscriptions, at the point the new price is in use.
19.1.16 For your safety, credit/debit card details are not stored nor shared with third parties. Payment transactions are processed via PayPal, Stripe or other secure third party payment providers and You are encouraged to read the terms and conditions for any financial transactions with either of these companies. In short, we value your safety as highly as we would our own.
19.1.17 As per Clause 14.2, You acknowledge that all content remains the property of Twinkl at all times. You also understand that your purchasing of a Twinkl Membership package constitutes a licence for the use of Twinkl material for the duration of the subscription only.
19.1.18 Any resources downloaded may not be shared or otherwise hosted on any networked system. Resources are for the single and sole use of the person downloading them and any replication or sharing of resources (without written permission of the CEO) will result in Twinkl Ltd taking action to protect its rights under the licence stipulated in 19.1.17.
19.1.19 You may sign up for a promotional pricing offer available from time to time. Any such offer shall be subject to Twinkl's
Promotional Offer Terms and Conditions
.
Membership Service Acceptable Use Policy
20.1 The Membership Service is designed to allow individual users to download additional teaching resources for their own needs. Collectively, the Twinkl resource collection has taken many years to create.
20.2 The Membership Service is subject to an acceptable use policy, and user accounts are monitored. Twinkl will monitor your number of downloads, frequency of downloads, contents of downloads, your frequency of access, your location of access (IP address and device). Twinkl considers that no individual user would reasonably need to download large quantities of resources, crossing an extensive range of age groups, topics and specialisms, from a wide variety of locations and devices. If your account is subject to investigation under our acceptable use policy, you may contact us to request reactivation of your account in accordance with clause 3.5.
20.3 The Membership Service allows the Twinkl community to support the hard work of the Twinkl staff in helping those who teach. As such, any violation of the terms of Clause 19 or 20.2 is taken seriously and the user's account may be suspended immediately to allow for further investigation. If we remain unsatisfied that your account is being used solely for your own needs we may suspend your membership indefinitely.
Membership Service gift vouchers
21.1 The Membership Service can also be purchased by way of gift voucher through the Website.
21.2 A gift voucher purchase is subject to the terms of clause 21.3 but additionally to all provisions of clause 19 (notably clause 19.1.8).
21.3 A gift voucher will be delivered to You electronically at the point of payment and must be used within one (1) year of the date and time of purchase. If it is not used within this time period it will expire and You will no longer be able to make use of it.
Product Service
22.1 The Product Service allows You to purchase physical products directly from the Website and have them delivered to You.
22.2 Unless we agree otherwise, when you place an Order through the Website or otherwise, the price You pay will include first class postage to UK mainland addresses only. If You are ordering from overseas, we are happy to process the order, but will charge and additional postage surcharge.
22.3 When You place an order with us, this is technically an Offer from you, to us. We will deem to have accepted this offer when the Order has been processed and the product posted. We reserve the right to cancel any order for any reason and will refund you your money if we do so.
22.4 We aim to process and send out Your order as quickly as possible. This will usually be the same day, but it may take up to five days to process.
22.5 Please ensure that you check the address you have set up in PayPal as your postal address. We are not responsible for any orders sent to the wrong address, where you have not informed us of a change of address within 2 hours of placing your order.
22.6 If the product(s) provided under the Product Service are not what You ordered or the delivery is of an incorrect quantity, We shall have no liability to You unless You notify Us in writing at our contact address of the problem within 5 working days of the delivery of the service in question.
22.7 If You notify a problem to Us under clause 22.6 above, our only obligation will be, at Your option:
22.7.1 to make good any shortage or non-delivery;
22.7.2 to repair and resend any products that are damaged or defective.
22.8 Save as precluded by law, We will not be liable to You for any indirect or consequential loss, damage or expenses (including loss of profits, business or goodwill) howsoever arising out of any problem You notify to Us under this contract and We shall have no liability to pay any money to You by way of compensation other than to refund to You the amount paid by You for the relevant order.
22.9 You must observe and comply with all applicable regulations and legislation, including obtaining all necessary customs, import or other permits to purchase the Services from our site. The importation or exportation of certain goods may be prohibited by certain national laws. We make no representation and accept no liability in respect of the export or import of the products under the service You purchase.
Forum Service
23.1 The forum service is subject to our Forum Community
House Rules
and our
Forum Etiquette
. Please note that a breach of either of these sets of rules is likely to result in the suspension of your service and an indefinite ban.
Create Service
24.1 The Twinkl Create service (hosted at www.twinkl.co.uk/create) is subject to these Terms and Conditions and in an addition the following conditions shall apply to this service:
24.1.1 Twinkl makes available the Create Service to You upon payment of a fee as specified from time to time on the Website.
24.1.2 In accordance with the general Terms and Conditions, Your User and account username and password will not be shared with anyone.
24.1.3 Your use of the Create service is a request by You, to Us, to create a specified resource for You. We may decide to use the Create service to fulfill this request, but You may also assist Us by creating the resource yourself using the Create Service. In this regard, You understand that by using the Create service, You are producing products for Twinkl Ltd and not for your own personal use. Once your product has been created, we may, at our discretion, allow You to access the resource after our approval.
24.1.4 You may share resources created through the Create Service for educational use only but you may not sell these resources. When you share these resources, you must not remove the Twinkl logo.
24.1.5 You have explicitly read and agree to abide by the Twinkl Copyright Terms.
24.1.6 All resources you produce through the Create service are the ownership of Twinkl Ltd absolutely and you further consent to Clause 7.2 of these Terms and Conditions.
24.1.7 You agree that a breach of any of the general Terms and Conditions will lead to Your access to the Create Service being immediately suspended. It is at Twinkl's absolute discretion as to whether Your account will be reinstated.
24.1.8 You understand and agree that we will monitor Your usage of the Service to allow us to determine whether a violation has, or is, occurring.
24.1.9 Due to the electronic nature of the subscription, you understand and agree that we are unable to offer refunds under any circumstance.
24.1.10 You agree that Anything which is uploaded within the Twinkl website is dealt with in accordance with our Privacy Policy. By uploading personally identifiable information (e.g. photographs and class lists), you agree that you have permission to do so. Misuse of this service, including uploading inappropriate or offensive content will not be tolerated.
Intellectual property
25.1 The contents of the Website are protected by international copyright laws and other intellectual property rights. The owner of these rights is Twinkl Limited or other third party licensors. All product and company names and logos mentioned in our Website are the trade marks, service marks or trading names of their respective owners including us.
25.2 Any material or information downloaded from this Website is subject to Copyright Terms. Except as stated in this clause, You may not modify, copy, reproduce, republish, upload, post, transmit or distribute, by any means or in any manner, any material or information downloaded from this Website without prior written authorisation from a director of Twinkl Limited. You may modify any resource that has been provided in an editable format to meet the needs of your learners, but you may not copy, reproduce, republish, upload, post, transmit or distribute, by any means or in any manner the same.
Notices
26.1 Unless otherwise expressly stated in these Terms and Conditions, all notices from You to Us must be in writing and sent to our contact address at Twinkl Limited, Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom.
26.2 Notices from Us to You may be in writing or electronic format (to include both email and notice via the Website).
Age Restrictions
27.1 You must be over 18 to take out a subscription to the Membership Service or register as a free user of the website.
27.2 An individual under 18 may use the website if they have the consent of their parent or guardian or their teacher if they are using the website in an educational context. By allowing an individual under 18 to use the website in any way, You agree to provide us on request with the required consent in a format to be determined by Us at our absolute discretion.
Invalidity
28.1 If any part of these Terms and Conditions is unenforceable (including any provision in which We exclude our liability to You) the enforceability of any other part of these conditions will not be affected.
Privacy
29.1 You acknowledge and agree to be bound by the terms of our
Privacy Policy
.
Third party rights
30.1 Except for our affiliates, directors, employees or representatives, a person who is not a party to this agreement has no right under the United Kingdom Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 to enforce any term of this agreement but this does not affect any right or remedy of a third party that exists or is available apart from that Act.
Entire agreement
31.1 These Terms and Conditions, together with our current Website prices, delivery details, contact details and privacy policy, set out the whole of our agreement relating to the supply of the Services to You by Us.
Waiver
32.1 No delay or failure by Twinkl to exercise any of its powers, rights or remedies under this agreement shall operate as a waiver of them nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such powers, rights or remedies preclude any other or further exercise of them. Any waiver, to be effective, must be in writing.
Governing law
33.1 The contract between us shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with English law and the English courts shall have jurisdiction to resolve any disputes between us.
33.2 Your use of this Website and any dispute arising out of such use of the Website is subject to the laws of England and Wales and You hereby consent to this jurisdiction.
Twinkl Membership for Schools
34.1 Twinkl School Membership accounts are also subject to our
Schools Terms and Conditions.
Learner Login
(formerly known as Twinkl Assessment)
35.1 By using Learner Login (formerly known as Twinkl Assessment) as an Individual Member, you agree not to enter any personally identifiable information of yourself or anyone else. In particular, you agree to use nicknames or aliases as your user identifiers and not actual names. You also agree to inform anyone using as Learner Login associated with your account not to enter any personally identifiable information. If you or one of your learners does enter personally identifiable information, you agree to delete it immediately.
35.2 For those using Learner Login (formerly known as Twinkl Assessment) under a School Membership account, their use is governed by the data protection agreement contained within the Schools Terms and Conditions.
Twinkl Subscription Offers and Competitions
36.1 All competitions or offers coordinated by Twinkl on official social media accounts will make clear what any offer includes, who is able to participate, how to participate and when said competitions begins and ends. Any entries that do not meet these requirements will not be entered in to any promotion.
36.2 Promotions by Twinkl staff will give specific restrictions and conditions of entry for each offer in the launching of any competition. Twinkl staff operating the promotions will be available to answer questions and clarify the terms of entry for any potential entries.
36.3 Any given conditions of entry will be made clear before or at the time of entry for prize draws, discount opportunities or offer codes. These conditions will remain accessible through the period of the promotion.
Image Library (www.twinkl.com/illustration)
37.1 Your use of the Image Library is subject to the following:
37.2 You may not host more than 5 images using the link hosting option without prior written approval of Twinkl's CEO.
37.3 If you host an image on your site, you must provide credit for the image to www.twinkl.com and the owner as Twinkl Ltd.
37.4 All usage of the link hosting option and any usage of Twinkl artwork must be non-commercial without prior written approval of Twinkl's CEO.
Contacting us if there is a problem -
If you have any concerns about your membership, the website or our resources or if you would like to make a complaint, please contact the TwinklCares team at TwinklCares@twinkl.co.uk. We will endeavour to respond to all concerns within 24 hours.
Website Credit
39.1 This clause 39 applies to: a) promotional rewards added to your account by Twinkl; and b) promotional rewards given in relation to any promotional or other offer for ‘Twinkl Credit’ as set out on the landing or offer page or email for such offer, (
Twinkl Credit
).
39.2 Twinkl Credit is only available to customers in the UK. All Twinkl Credit shall be issued in GBP.
39.3 Twinkl Credit may only be redeemed against an order for an annual Ultimate Twinkl subscription plan placed through the ‘My Credit’ page of the Website.
39.4 By redeeming Twinkl Credit against an order, you agree that if you receive a refund against that order, that Twinkl Credit shall not be available for re-use and shall not be refunded in any other manner.
39.5 If you are eligible to use or redeem Twinkl Credit in accordance with this clause 39, you may view the balance of your Twinkl Credit in the ‘My Credit’ page of the Website.
39.6 Twinkl Credit: a) is not redeemable for cash or any other balance; b) may not be used in conjunction with any other promotional offer; c) may not be transferred or assigned; and d) may only be used and redeemed in accordance with this clause 39.
39.7 Twinkl may, at its sole discretion: a) withdraw, revoke or amend the Twinkl Credit reward available or issued in relation to any promotional or other offer; b) revoke any or all Twinkl Credit; or c) close its Twinkl Credit programme, in any case without notice.
Prize Promotion General Terms and Conditions
1. THESE GENERAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS
1.1 These general terms and conditions (‘the General Terms’) are the overarching general terms and conditions that apply to all competitions and prize draws promoted by Twinkl Ltd (‘the Promotion’).
1.2 Each Promotion will also have its own specific terms and conditions such as the details of how to enter, opening/closing dates, eligibility criteria, and the kind of prize you may win (‘the Specific Terms’).
1.3 You should read these General Terms in combination with the relevant set of Specific Terms. Where the Specific Terms conflict with these General Terms, the Specific Terms will take precedence.
1.4 We may change these General Terms at any time. You should check this page regularly for any changes. Any changes will apply from the date that they are uploaded.
1.5 By entering a Promotion you agree that you will be legally bound by these General Terms and any applicable Specific Terms.
2. IDENTITY OF THE PROMOTER OF THE COMPETITION
2.1 The promoter of a competition or prize draw is the person who is responsible for running it. Unless any Specific Terms tell you otherwise, the promoter of the Promotion will be Twinkl Ltd, a company registered in England and Wales under number 07201458 whose registered office is at Wards Exchange, 197 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, England, S11 8HW (‘we’, ‘our’, ‘us’). You should contact us in the first place if you have any issues or problems in relation to a Promotion. You can write to us at our registered office address or by email at legal@twinkl[dot]co[dot]uk if you have any concern relating to any Promotion, setting out clearly which Promotion and your issue.
2.2 In addition, certain Promotions may provide entrants with additional methods of contacting us, for example posting on a Facebook group or tweeting on a Twitter feed. In these cases, you may also use this method to contact us.
3. COMPETITION ELIGIBILITY RULES
3.1 Unless stated otherwise in the applicable Specific Terms, entrants to our Promotions must be aged 18 or over and must be resident in the UK.
3.2 You may not enter a Promotion if you are:
a) our employee or an employee of our holding or subsidiary companies;
b) an employee of one of our content partners, agents or suppliers who are professionally connected with the Promotion or its administration; or
c) a member of the immediate family or household of a) or b) above.
3.3 Certain Promotions may have additional eligibility requirements, such as a current subscription to our services or a requirement to be engaged in a specified profession. Any such additional eligibility requirements will be stated in the applicable Specific Terms.
3.4 Where a Promotion is open to children (aged 15 or younger) and/or young persons (aged 16 or 17), the age requirements will be stated in the applicable Specific Terms. We may require that the parent or guardian of any person aged under 18 confirms in writing that he/she agrees to be bound by all terms and conditions applicable to the relevant Promotion and will accept any prize on behalf of a prize winner who is under 18.
3.5 We will decide, in our sole discretion, whether any eligibility requirement has or has not been met and we may require evidence or confirmation from entrants at any time before awarding prizes.
4. ENTRY AND ENTRY METHODS
4.1 By online form: Where entry is by filling in and submitting an online form, you will need a device capable of accessing the internet and the form for the applicable Promotion. Online form entries are deemed to be received upon submission confirmation. Entries submitted in this way must be completed with all required details in full as specified in the Specific Terms or indicated with an asterisk (“*”) next to the fillable field of the form. Entries which fail to provide the required details will be void.
4.2 By social media: Where entry is via social media, you will need a device capable of accessing the internet and, depending on the platform on which the Promotion is run, an account for the applicable social media service.
Unless otherwise stated in the Specific Terms, for:
a) a competition requiring a social media post to be posted for entry, the entry will be deemed to be received when and only if the social media post is visible to the public or all members of the group in which it is posted; or
b) a competition requiring a message to be sent to us via social media, the entry will be deemed to be received when the message is received by us.
4.3 By post: Where you enter by post, you must place your entry postcard containing your email address, phone number, name, and any other details specified in the Specific Terms inside an envelope. You may post the entry by any second or first class method of postage. Postal entries must arrive at least one week before the draw date specified in the Specific Terms. Entries not received inside an envelope, later than one week before the draw date, or which are incomplete will not be counted. We will not return any postal entries.
4.4 Deficient Entries: In all Promotions, we reserve the right to reject any entries that are inaudible, incomplete, incomprehensible, damaged or otherwise deficient. We also reserve the right to reject entries that are unlawful, indecent, racist, inflammatory, defamatory or which we consider to be otherwise harmful to the goodwill and reputation of us or our brands. We accept no responsibility for any late, lost or misdirected entries, including but not limited to posts, messages, emails, or online form submissions not received due to technical disruptions, network congestion, spoilage, or any other reason.
4.5 Automated Entry: The use of any automated entry software or any other mechanical or electronic means (in any case otherwise than administered by us as part of the Promotion) that permits any person to enter any Promotion repeatedly is prohibited.
4.6 Names: Entrants must enter Promotions using their legal names. We reserve the right to disqualify any entrant who uses multiple names and to require them to return any prize they may have won.
4.7 Multiple Entries: Unless otherwise permitted pursuant to any Specific Terms, no person may enter a particular Promotion more than once and persons may not enter a Promotion as part of a syndicate or on behalf of any other person, syndicate, group, society or company.
5. PRIZES
5.1 The prize for each Promotion will be as stated in the Specific Terms. We reserve in all cases the right to replace the stated prize with a prize that we consider to be of broadly equivalent value. We offer no cash alternative for non-cash prizes and prize winners must accept prizes in the form offered.
5.2 Unless otherwise stated in the applicable Specific Terms, all prize winners will be notified that they have won a prize within twenty eight (28) days of the closing date of the Promotion either by email or social media message.
5.3 Prizes will be dispatched to the prize winners via the UK mail service unless otherwise stated in the applicable Specific Terms or if the prize is a cash prize. Prizes will be delivered to addresses within the UK only. If a prize winner’s contact details change, it is their responsibility to notify us. We will not be liable for any prizes which are lost, delayed, or damaged in the post for reasons beyond our control.
5.4 If the prize is a cash prize, the winner will be required to provide UK bank details to us within 7 days of our requesting these by contacting the winner. If the winner fails to provide this information within this time, we reserve the right to choose an alternative prize winner or not issue the prize at all.
5.5 We reserve the right to request proof of a prize winner’s identity and age in the form of a passport or driver’s licence and proof of address in the form of a recent utility bill. In the event that a prize winner cannot provide us with such proof, in a form reasonably acceptable to us, we may withdraw the prize and select another prize winner.
5.6 All prizes are subject to availability, are non-transferable and non-exchangeable.
5.7 If a prize winner does not take any element of a prize at the time stipulated by us (or any relevant third party prize provider) then that element of the prize will be forfeited by the prize winner. No cash will be awarded in lieu of that prize or any part of it.
5.8 Any tax payable as a result of a prize being awarded or received will be the responsibility of the prize winner. Winners should seek independent financial advice prior to accepting a prize if this is a concern and should not rely on any information provided in the Promotion to this effect.
5.9 We make no representation or warranty in relation to prizes provided and to the fullest extent permitted by law we shall have no liability to you in relation to any prize, including but not limited to its fitness for purposes. We reserve the right to disqualify entrants from entering our Promotions or prize winners from receiving their prizes where any such person engages in unsafe, illegal, unsociable or inappropriate behaviour or whose conduct is contrary to the spirit or intention of the Promotion.
5.10 No additional, further or other costs or expenses are included in any prize unless stated in the applicable Specific Terms.
5.11 Third party suppliers of prizes may stipulate their own terms, conditions or restrictions and all prize winners agree to be bound by these in addition to these General Terms and the applicable Specific Terms. Subject to paragraph 14 below, we shall have no liability in relation to any prize provided by a third party provider.
6. UNCLAIMED PRIZES
6.1 All prizes must be claimed within twenty-one (21) days of our notification of winning or as otherwise stated in any Specific Terms. We reserve the right to award prizes unclaimed after this period to alternative prize winners or not to award them at all.
6.2 If you contact us in any way to claim a prize from a different email address/social media account, you must provide us with and confirm your contact details, otherwise we may be unable to contact you and validate your winning the prize and you may as a result forfeit your prize.
7. PUBLICITY AND PERSONAL INFORMATION
7.1 The personal information supplied by entrants when entering our Promotions will be used by us in accordance with our Privacy Policy, available at https://www.twinkl.co.uk/legal#privacy-policy. By entering any Promotion, you consent to such processing and you warrant that all data provided by you is accurate.
7.2 If you are required to submit a third party’s personal information as a part of entry into or participation in any Promotion, you must ensure that any other person whose details have been provided by the entrant to us has given their consent for their details to be provided to us and to be contacted by us in relation to the relevant Promotion.
7.3 If you are the winner of a Promotion, you agree that we may use your name, image and town and/or county of residence to announce the winner of such Promotion and for any other reasonable and related promotional purposes. You further agree and acknowledge that publicity materials featuring you may be provided to our third party prize providers for the purposes of promoting their association with the Promotion and for awarding the relevant prizes.
7.4 No fees shall be payable to any entrant in relation to their entry in any Promotion.
8. PHOTOGRAPHS AND VIDEOS
If any Promotion requires you to submit a photograph or video clip as a part of entry into or participation in the Promotion (collectively, ‘the Photograph’):
8.1 you warrant that you are the person in the Photograph or have prior approval from the person in the Photograph (or that person’s parent or legal guardian, if the person in the Photograph is under 18) for it to be submitted as part of your entry;
8.2 you agree that we have the right to publish and communicate to the public the Photograph in any media at all times without restriction or limitation throughout the world for any purpose;
8.3 you acknowledge that we may edit the Photograph in our sole discretion;
8.4 you agree that we have the right to use your name, likeness and other personal information in conjunction with the Photograph;
8.5 you agree not to bring against us any actions, suits, claims or demands in respect of defamation or any infringement or violation of any personal and/or property rights of any sort from our use of your Photograph;
8.6 you unconditionally waive your right to seek or obtain an injunction to prevent or restrict our use of the Photograph; and
8.7 entrants aged under 18 shall have obtained the consent of a parent or a guardian (and will provide us with the contact details we need should we wish to verify this).
9. PRIZE DRAWS
9.1 Where any prize is awarded via a prize draw, prize winners will be chosen at random from all qualifying entries within thirty (30) days of the Promotion closing date, unless stated otherwise in the Specific Terms.
9.2 If we become aware that the same person has been selected as a prize winner more than once in the same Promotion, that person will win one prize only and we may draw another prize winner at our discretion.
10. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
10.1 By entering a Promotion you hereby:
10.1.1 assign to us all rights (including present and future copyright) in and to your Promotion entry in all media and whether in existence now or created in the future;
10.1.2 agree not to assert any “moral rights” in respect of your Promotion entry (wherever and whenever such rights are recognised) against us, our assigns, licensees and successors in title;
10.1.3 undertake to us that your Promotion entry: (a) is not in breach of any third party rights; and (b) does not contain anything which is defamatory, indecent, harassing or threatening; and
10.1.4 confirm that you have the full right, power and authority to grant the rights set out above and that you have obtained all consents and permissions necessary to grant to us the same.
10.2 All rights in and to the name and title of each Promotion and the format of the Promotion are our sole property and we may exploit the same in our absolute discretion.
11. PROCESS FAILURES AND OTHER MATTERS
If a Promotion is not capable of running as planned for any reason (including but not limited to as a result of any technical failures, unauthorised intervention, computer virus, mobile network failure, tampering, fraud or any other causes beyond our control which corrupt or affect the administration, security, fairness, integrity or proper conduct of such Promotion), we reserve the right to cancel, terminate, modify or suspend the Promotion and/or any prize draw(s) or judging related to the Promotion and/or to disqualify any individual who (whether directly or indirectly) causes the problem.
12. DECISIONS
12.1 All our decisions relating to Promotions and/or redemption of prizes are final. No discussions or correspondence with entrants or any other person will be entered into in this regard.
12.2 Tiebreakers, disputes, conflicts, questions or concerns will be managed by us and, if required by law, by an independent adjudicator.
12.3 Where a Promotion involves voting, the accuracy of the results will be final and binding and no correspondence will be entered into in this regard.
13. FAILURE TO ENFORCE GENERAL TERMS
A failure by us to enforce these General Terms, any Specific Terms, or any part thereof in either case in any instance(s) will not give rise to a claim or right of action by any entrant or prize winner, nor shall it be deemed a waiver of any of our rights in relation to the same.
14. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1 Except as specifically set out herein and to the maximum extent permitted by law, all conditions, warranties and representations expressed or implied by law are hereby excluded.
14.2 To the fullest extent permitted by law, we hereby exclude and shall not have any liability to any entrant or prize winner in connection with or arising out of any Promotion howsoever caused, including for any costs, expenses, forfeited prizes, damages and other liabilities, provided that nothing herein shall operate so as to limit or exclude our liability for personal injury or death caused by our negligence. For the avoidance of doubt, this paragraph shall also apply in respect of any prize provided by a third party provider.
14.3 In the event that any provision of these General Terms and/or any Specific Terms are held to be illegal, invalid, void or otherwise unenforceable, such provisions shall be severed from the remaining provisions, which shall continue in full force and effect.
15. GENERAL
15.1 If there is any reason to believe that there has been a breach of the General Terms or Specific Terms, we may, at our sole and absolute discretion, exclude an entrant from participating in the Promotion and require the return or reimbursement of any prize where such prize has been awarded to such entrant.
15.2 We may vary the terms of, or terminate, a Promotion at any time at our absolute discretion without liability to any entrant or other person. We will not award any prize if the Promotion is terminated.
Call Recordings Privacy Notice
Introduction
This notice is in addition to the
General Privacy Policy
. In the event that the Twinkl Call Recordings Privacy Notice conflicts with the General Privacy Policy, then the latter will prevail.
This privacy notice applies to telephone calls recorded by Twinkl Ltd. When a caller telephones Twinkl Ltd, the call is recorded. Such a call may contain personal data.
What is the purpose and legal grounds of call recordings?
The purpose of call recordings is to provide you with the best customer service possible. Best customer service possible means that we record your calls for:
training and quality services;
providing a record of your complaints or issues to investigate and rectify; and
ensuring our staff’s own security from abusive or mischievous calls
To use call recordings for the purposes described, we’ll rely on a condition known as legitimate interests, unless those interests are overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the participants in the call.  You may therefore object to this processing if you think that your legitimate interests outweigh ours.
Who does Twinkl share call recordings with?
The call recordings may be shared with the following:
The Twinkl group of companies on a worldwide basis.
Third parties who deliver this service to you
Other third parties by law
How long does Twinkl retain call recordings?
We will retain calls for 18 months. However, this retention period may be extended if we need to rely on those recordings for legal proceedings.
What calls are recorded?
Calls which are recorded are: all inbound calls to Twinkl Customer and School Accounts team/helpdesks.
All callers are advised that calls will be recorded as part of a pre-recorded welcome message before being connected to Twinkl Ltd. The message states:
“Welcome to Twinkl Cares!  Just to let you know we record our calls to help us provide you with the best service possible. Don't want your call recorded? Email us at twinklcares@twinkl.com instead. Otherwise just stay on the line and we'll be with you soon.”
The message is followed by a beep/tone to indicate that the recording has started. The recording automatically stops when the caller disconnects from the call. You provide your agreement to the call recording by staying on the line after the pre-welcome message.
How can I contact Twinkl if I do not want to be recorded?
You may contact us by an alternative means such as mail or email.
Email:
 twinklcares@twinkl.co.uk or schools@twinkl.co.uk
Postal Address: Twinkl Global HQ, Wards Exchange, 197 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, UK
Where are call recordings stored?
Call recordings are stored by our Data Processor, on Zendesk Cloud Servers. We hold the appropriate legal documentation, as required by current data protection laws.
We may also download copies and store your call recordings on our encrypted servers for the purposes listed in this notice and for evidence in any legal proceedings.
Can I request a copy of a recording?
You may request a copy of a recorded telephone conversation, verbally or in writing. However, if we cannot verify your identity, we may request further identity information which may only be provided via further written communication. Only after obtaining all the relevant information to identify you, will we provide your recorded voice recordings within the current legal time frame of 1 month.
As with most subject access requests, there will be no fee for providing your information. However, we may charge a reasonable fee for the administrative costs of complying with a request if it is manifestly unfounded or excessive or if you require further copies of the data following a request.
When requesting a copy of a recorded telephone conversation please provide details to successfully identify you, the date and time of the call, if possible, in order to provide your information as quickly as possible to you (see the example below).
Call recording request form
Full name
Email address registered with your account
Username
Postal address
Month and Year  of  joining Twinkl
Date and time of call if possible
Date                               Approx Time
Format of data
WAV, MP3, CD-Rom, Transcript,
(Please delete unwanted options)
Data to be sent to….
Postal address/email
(Please delete unwanted options)
We have up to 30 days from the date of receipt of a valid and authenticated request but if you can provide the date range and the time of your call recording, we will be able to respond to your request more quickly.
A permanent copy of the recording will be provided in a format that Twinkl can reasonably expect the enquirer will be able to use; taking account of the enquirer’s preference (if any), practicality and cost of preparation. Formats could include WAV, MP3, other digital format or a transcript.
Please submit your request via email or to the postal address as above: twinklcares@twinkl.co.uk  or schools@twinkl.co.uk
Alternatively, use the contact information on our contact us page.
Will there be changes to this call recording policy?
Our Call Recording Policy may change from time to time due to changes in how we operate our business or in the UK legislation governing call recording. We will amend any changes to our Call Recording Policy on this page.
What are my rights?
Please refer to our General Privacy Policy.
What if I have concerns regarding Twinkl Ltd’s call recording policy?
If you have any concerns about this policy and your data protection rights, please contact the DPO at dpo@twinkl.co.uk
We will undertake to resolve directly with you any concerns that you may have. Should we not be able to,  then the matter can be addressed to the Information Commissioner’s Office at Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF. Telephone number: 0303 123 1113.
Product Service Terms
Please read the following important terms and conditions before you subscribe to any physical product service on our website and check that they contain everything you want and nothing that you are not willing to agree to.
In this contract:
‘
Twinkl
’, ‘
we
’, ‘
us
’, or ‘
our
’ means Twinkl Ltd, a company incorporated in England and Wales under company number 07201458 and whose registered office is at Wards Exchange, 197 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, England, S11 8HW; and
‘
you
’ or ‘
your
’ means the person using our site to buy goods from us.
If you have any questions about this contract or any orders you have placed, please contact us by sending an email to our Twinkl Cares team at
twinklcares@twinkl.co.uk
.
Introduction
Twinkl sells physical goods subscriptions separately from its premium membership subscriptions. Each of these is a ‘
Product Service
’.
For each Product Service, one or more physical goods (each a ‘
Product
’) is provided to you separately at regular intervals as specified for that Product Service. Each Product is paid for separately by you before dispatch of the Product.
The ‘
Price
’ you pay for each Product is as specified on the Product Service page or as altered and notified to you from time to time.
When you subscribe to a Product Service on our website, you agree to be legally bound by these terms and conditions. The minimum duration of your subscription for a Product Service is one Product.
By subscribing to a Product Service, you also agree to be bound by:
our website terms and conditions and any documents referred to in them, including without limitation our privacy policy (see twinkl.co.uk/legal);
extra terms which may add to, or replace some of, this contract. This may happen for security, legal, regulatory, or other reasonable reasons. We will contact you to let you know if we intend to do this by giving you one month’s notice. If you do not agree to these changes, you can end this contract at any time by giving notice under these terms and conditions in accordance with clause 5; and
specific terms which apply to certain Product Services. These are detailed on the relevant webpage for the Product Service as updated from time to time.
All of the documents in clause 1.5 form part of this contract as though set out in full here. If there is a conflict between the website terms and conditions and these terms and conditions, these terms and conditions will apply to that extent.
We may change any of the terms of this contract, including the Price, at any time by giving you reasonable notice in advance of payment being taken for a Product. If you are not happy with such change, you can end the contract in accordance with clause 5.
Information we give you
By law, the Consumer Contracts (Information, Cancellation and Additional Charges) Regulations 2013 say that we must give you certain key information before a legally binding contract between you and us is made. This key information will be provided in:
these Product Service terms and conditions;
our Subscription Confirmation Email (see clause 4.4);
in relation to the Product, our Product Confirmation Email (see clause 4.7); and/or
the Product Service webpage.
You can also get access to this information by contacting us (see
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
).
The key information we give you by law forms part of this contract as though it is set out in full here.
If we have to change any key information once a legally binding contract between you and us is made, we can only do this if you agree to it.
Privacy and personal information
Our Privacy Policy is available at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/legal
as updated from time to time.
Your privacy and personal information are important to us. Any personal information that you provide to us will be dealt with in line with our Privacy Policy, which explains what personal information we collect from you, how and why we collect, store, use, and share such information, your rights in relation to your personal information and how to contact us and supervisory authorities if you have a query or complaint about the use of your personal information.
Subscribing to a Product Service
Below, we set out how a legally binding contract between you and us is made.
You place an order to subscribe for the Product Service by clicking the ‘Subscribe Now’ button on the Product Service page, entering your details, and filling in and submitting your payment details. Please read and check your order carefully before submitting it. You will be able to correct any errors before submitting your order to us.
By placing an order, you are agreeing that Twinkl will charge you, in respect of each Product, the Price at such intervals as specified for the Product Service until the contract for the Product Service is cancelled.
When you place your order to subscribe at the end of the online checkout process (e.g. when you click on the ‘Pay’ button), we will acknowledge your subscription to the Product Service by email. This is a
Subscription Confirmation Email
.
A Subscription Confirmation Email means that your order to subscribe to the Product Service has been accepted by us and you have subscribed to the Product Service. At this point, a legally binding contract will be in place between you and us.
We may send you a
Product Confirmation Email
within a reasonable time prior to our taking payment for and/or delivery of each Product.
If you are under the age of 18, you may not subscribe to any Product Service on our site.
You may not subscribe to any Product Service if you are not a consumer. If you are a business, please contact us at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
to register your interest for the Product Service.
Right to cancel
You have the right to cancel this subscription within 14 days without giving any reason.
You may cancel the subscription for the Product Service at any time provided that notice of such cancellation is received by us within the
Cancellation Period
in the relevant Product Service page.
You cannot cancel your subscription outside the Cancellation Period.
To exercise the right to cancel, you must inform us of your decision to cancel your subscription either via our website or by contacting us using a method set out here:
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
. Your contract with us for the Product Service will be cancelled from the point at which we confirm your cancellation by notifying you of this.
We may cancel your subscription for the Product Service at any time prior to delivery of any Product. We will notify you by email if this occurs and refund you for any payment made for any Product which has not been delivered.
Effects of cancellation
If you cancel this contract and you have already made a payment for a Product which you have not yet received, we will refund to you all payments received.
We will make the reimbursement using the same means of payment as you used for the Product transaction, unless you have expressly agreed otherwise.
If you have cancelled this contract after a Product has been dispatched by us or delivered to you, we may make a deduction from the reimbursement for loss in value of any goods supplied and all delivery costs.
We may withhold reimbursement until we have received the Product back.
If you have received goods:
you shall send back the goods or hand them over to us without undue delay and in any event not later than 14 days from the day on which you communicate your cancellation from this contract to us. The deadline is met if you send the goods back before the period of 14 days has expired;
you will bear the cost of returning the goods; and
you are liable for any diminished value of the goods resulting from the handling other than what is necessary to establish the nature, characteristics and functioning of the goods.
Delivery
The estimated schedule for delivery of each Product in the Product Service is set out in the Product Service page from time to time or the Subscription Confirmation Email. If there is a conflict between the Product Service page and the Subscription Confirmation Email relating to the estimated delivery schedule of the Products in the Product Service, you must contact us. We may tell you which schedule is correct for the Product Service or inform you of an alternative delivery schedule.
The estimated delivery of each Product may be set out in any Product Confirmation Email sent to you before each Product delivery (‘the
Expected Arrival Date
’). If a Product Confirmation Email is not sent to you, the Expected Arrival Date of each Product is as described in the delivery schedule in clause 7.1.
If something happens which is outside of our control, the Expected Arrival Date may be affected. We may provide you with a revised Expected Arrival Date at any time.
You will not have a right to cancel or receive a refund for non-delivery unless the product has not been delivered within a reasonable time following the month of the Expected Arrival Date.
If a Product has not been delivered by the Expected Arrival Date, you must contact us at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
. We may either arrange for a replacement Product to be delivered to you or a refund for that Product at our discretion.
Delivery will take place as the address specified by you when you placed your order with us for the Product Service. If you wish to change this address for any delivery of the ongoing Product Service, please contact us at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
.
Each Product is separate and non-delivery of one Product does not affect the contract for the remaining Products prior to cancellation of this contract.
Payment
We will do all that we reasonably can to ensure that all of the information you give us when submitting your payment details for the Product Service is secure by using an encrypted secure payment mechanism. However, in the absence of negligence on our part, any failure by us to comply with this contract or our Privacy Policy (see clause 3) or breach by us of our duties under applicable laws, we will not be legally responsible to you for any loss that you may suffer if a third party gains unauthorised access to any information that you give us.
Your payment method will be charged prior to dispatch of each Product.
If your payment is not received by us and you have already received a Product, you must:
pay for such Product as soon as possible and in any case within 30 days of receipt of the Product; or
return the Product to us as soon as possible and in any case within 30 days of receipt of the Product. If so, you must keep the Product in your possession until you return it to us, take reasonable care of it whilst it is in your possession, and not use the Product prior to returning it to us.
If you do not pay for the Product or fail to return the Product in accordance with clause 8.3, we may collect the Product from you at your expense. We will try to contact you to let you know if we intend to do this.
Nothing in this clause affects your legal rights to cancel the contract during the Cancellation Period.
Nature of the Product
The Consumer Rights Act 2015 gives you certain legal rights (also known as ‘statutory rights’). The Product(s) that we provide to you must be as described, fit for purpose and of satisfactory quality.
We are under a legal duty to supply you with Products that are in conformity with this contract.
The packaging of the Product(s) may be different from that shown on the site.
While we try to make sure that:
all weights, sizes and measurements set out on the Product Service page are as accurate as possible, there may be a small tolerance of up to 5% in such weights, sizes and measurements; and
the colours of the Product are displayed accurately on the site, the actual colours that you see on your device may vary depending on the device that you use.
End of the contract
If this contract is ended it will not affect our right to receive any money which you owe to us under this contract.
Limitation on our liability
Except for any legal responsibility that we cannot exclude in law (such as for death or personal injury) or arising under applicable laws relating to the protection of your personal information, we are not legally responsible for any:
losses that were not foreseeable to you and us when the contract was formed;
losses that were not caused by any breach on our part;
business losses; or
losses to non-consumers.
Third party rights
No one other than a party to this contract has any right to enforce any term of this contract.
Disputes
We will try to resolve any disputes with you quickly and efficiently. If you are unhappy with a Product, the Product Service, or any other matter, please contact us as soon as possible using the contact details at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
The laws of England and Wales apply to this contract. Any disputes will be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of England and Wales.
You don't have to sign out unless you're on a shared or public computer.
Sign Out Anyway
Stay Signed In
Help
Cookie preferences
🍪
Twinkl uses cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalised content and analyse traffic.
Get more info or click 'Accept' to consent to our
policy
defined use of cookies.
We use cookies and similar technologies to enhance your experience on our website. Cookies help us to understand how you interact with our site, personalize content, and provide you with a more tailored browsing experience. By continuing to use our site, you agree to the use of cookies as outlined in this notice.
Cookies are small text files stored on your device when you visit a website. They allow the site to remember your preferences, login information, and other settings to make your experience more convenient. Cookies can also help us analyse website traffic and improve the performance and security of our site.
You can manage or disable cookies through your browser settings at any time. However, please be aware that disabling cookies may affect your experience on our website and limit the functionality available to you.
Manage cookies
Accept all cookies
Hear us out
👋
At Twinkl, your trust means everything to us. That's why we respect your privacy, protect it with commercial encryption and ensure that there are strict policies that govern how all data is handled.
Read more from Jon our CEO...
Necessary Cookies:
Cookies to ensure the correct technical functionality of the services we provide. Required.
Analytic Cookies:
Cookies used to understand the site traffic, user activity and for advertising. Click to toggle or read more in our
cookie policy
.
On
Off
Necessary cookies only
Save custom preferences
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/privacy-policy:
Recently Downloaded
Close
x
Filter By Age
Filter By Age Group
0 - 5 years old
Early Years
5 - 6 years old
Infants
6 - 7 years old
First Class
7 - 8 years old
Second Class
8 - 9 years old
Third Class
9 - 10 years old
Fourth Class
10 - 11 years old
Fifth Class
11 - 14 years old
Sixth Class
14+ years old
Secondary
x
Membership
Membership
Individual
Click here to see our price plans for individual memberships
School & Organisations
If your School or Organisation is looking for a Twinkl Membership then get in touch here
Sign In
Join for FREE
Home
Ari Ai Tool
ROI Resources
Create
<
>
Legal
Privacy policy
A message from Jon Seaton, Twinkl's CEO, about our commitment to your security and privacy.
At Twinkl, your trust means
everything
to us. That’s why we respect your privacy, protect it with commercial encryption and ensure that there are strict policies that govern how all data is handled.
We believe in telling you up front exactly what’s going to happen to your personal information and asking for your permission before you share it with us. And if you change your mind later, we make it easy to stop sharing with us. When we do ask to use your data, it’s to provide you with a better user experience and to be even more helpful to you.
Our business model is very straightforward: we sell beautifully designed and unique products, and we rely on you to purchase from us. We don’t build a profile based on your web browsing habits to sell to advertisers. Our website and services are designed to make the site experience and our teaching materials, better. Plain and simple.
Our commitment to protecting your privacy comes from the fact that Twinkl is a unique business – driven by educators, for all those who teach. We know that your trust doesn’t come easily. That’s why we have and always will work as hard as we can to earn and keep it.
We ask that you continue to support and promote our hard work and beautiful teaching materials and we will continue to support you in every way we can.
We care about you.
We care about the children you teach and the path that education is taking. We’re here to support and fight with you in every step of that journey – that’s our promise.
Jon
We ask that you read this Privacy Policy carefully as it contains important details about what personal data Twinkl Ltd. (also referred to as "we," "us" or "our") collects and processes when you use our services, including the choices we offer you to access, maintain and control it.
1. Your Twinkl Account and Service Data
1.1. When you register for and use our services or sign up to our competitions or free giveaways, we will collect and process your personal data, supplied by you, in order to be able to provide our services, competitions, giveaways, prizes and gifts to you.  Below is a table to inform you clearly of:
What personal data we collect on registration;
The purposes for processing;
The lawful basis for processing;
Data Collected
Purpose for Processing
Lawful Basis of Processing
Email address
To manage registration, perform account management and provide customer services
To identify you within our services and service usage
Administrative (i.e. financial, legal and regulatory compliance)
To contact you about products, events, services, feedback, prizes, gifts and free giveaways
Security
Contractual obligation, legal obligation, consent and legitimate interest
Username
To manage registration, perform account management and provide customer services
To identify you within our services and service usage
Administrative (i.e. financial, legal and regulatory compliance)
Security
Contractual obligation, legal obligation and legitimate interest
Password
Security
Contractual obligation, legal obligation and legitimate interest
Country
To manage registration, perform account management and provide customer services
Administrative (i.e. financial, legal and regulatory compliance)
To provide service personalisation and service improvement
Contractual obligation, legal obligation and legitimate interest
Occupation
To provide service personalisation and service improvement
Legitimate interest
1.2. We may also collect additional personal data if you supply it to us, become a paid subscriber or contact us. The consequences of not supplying this personal data may be that you cannot benefit from all of the services that you have signed up for, or that the services we provide to you will not be as customised, effective or secure. Below is a table to inform you clearly of:
What personal data we may collect;
The purposes for processing;
The lawful basis for processing;
Data Collected
Processing Purpose
Lawful Basis of Processing
First and Last Name
Provide a delivery service for goods purchased, record keeping & prevention of crime
Service personalisation and service improvement
Security
To contact you about products, events, services, prizes, gifts and free giveaways
Contractual obligation and consent
Full Address
Provide a delivery service for goods purchased, prizes won and free gifts
Record keeping & prevention of crime
Service personalisation and service improvement
Security
To contact you about products, events and services
Contractual obligation and consent
Phone number
Customer services
Security
To contact you about products, events and services
Consent
Gender
Service personalisation and service improvement
Security
Consent
Date of Birth
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Profile Information
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
County
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Name of Workplace
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Type of Workplace
Service personalisation and service improvement
Customer services
Security
Consent
Enquiry and Correspondence Data
Customer services
Account management
To offer, market and promote products, events and services
Legitimate interests
Publishing Data
(i.e. your posts and comments on our website)
To enable the publication of comments, reviews and posts on our Website
Consent
Transactional Data
(i.e. your payments)
To process information on your purchases or supply of goods.
To provide good administration
Business reporting
Contractual obligation and legitimate interest
‘Create’ Resource Data
Customer service
To enable the creation of pictorial, photographic and word-based resources by you.
Contractual and legitimate interest
Child's name
To provide personalised educational content and resource recommendations
Consent: Parents/Guardians provide consent, to agree to the collection and use of their child’s personal information for the stated purposes.
Legitimate Interests: Twinkl has a legitimate interest in processing this data to enhance the educational experience by offering personalised content tailored to the child’s needs.
Child's age
To provide personalised educational content and resource recommendations
Consent: Parents/Guardians provide consent, to agree to the collection and use of their child’s personal information for the stated purposes.
Legitimate Interests: Twinkl has a legitimate interest in processing this data to enhance the educational experience by offering personalised content tailored to the child’s needs.
1.3. Where legitimate interest is the lawful basis of processing your personal data, the legitimate interests we are pursuing are as follows: -
Providing you any products or services you have requested;
Analysing your use and measuring the effectiveness of our services to better understand how they are being used so we can improve them and engage and retain users;
Sending you information about our products, events and services, special offers and similar information (where your consent is not required);
To enable and support our recruitment of employees and sub-contractors;
Analysing your use of our services and interaction with our communications, to tailor and customize our services and marketing communications;
Diagnosing problems in our services;
Conducting surveys and market research about our customers, their interests, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and customer satisfaction (unless we need consent to undertake such surveys, in which case we will only do this with your permission);
Investigating and responding to any comments or complaints that you may send us;
In connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory and investigative purposes as necessary (including disclosure of information in connection with legal process or litigation).
1.4. Where contractual and legal obligations are the lawful basis of processing your personal data, the consequence of failing to provide your personal data will be that we are unable to provide our service to you.
1.5 We may process information relating to you where this has been provided by an employer or through our online school referral service. To illustrate, your employer may have provided us with your work contact details so that we can communicate with you and set up your school account; or your email may have been provided to our school referral service by someone who thought our service may be of interest to you and your school. In each case, we will provide you with the appropriate details from where we obtained your personal data in accordance with data protection laws.
1.6 You may provide us with specific information such as your child's name and age. By doing so, you agree that you have the right to provide this information and consent to our processing it. This informaion is used to tailor educational content and resources, ensuring it is age-appropriate and engaging. You may withdraw your consent for this processing.
2. Your Twinkl Service Usage Data
2.1. When you interact and make use of our services, we may capture and process usage data and may use this data to provide rewards and incentives either randomly or as part of a programme and we may publicly publish your success in achieving these rewards or incentives. This data is ultimately processed with the purpose of delivering reliable, secure and accurate services and to consistently enhance, improve and optimise your experience of using our services. We do not sell this data to third parties. Our legal basis for this processing is that of legitimate interest.Examples include: IP address; browser type and version; operating system used; website speed, website navigation paths and actions; and patterns of service use.
3. Sharing Your Personal Data
3.1. We will disclose your personal data to our employees to enable them to process your data.
3.2. Your personal data may also be disclosed to other companies in the Twinkl group, and to our agents, sub-contractors, data processors and suppliers (3rd parties) to enable them to process your personal data on our behalf.
3.2. When we supply any of your personal data to our agents, sub-contractors, data processors and suppliers (3rd parties), we protect your personal data by ensuring reasonable contractual arrangements are in place that stipulate compliance with this Privacy Policy.
3.3 Where your access to our services is granted under a school membership account, we shall, upon request, share your usage data (which shall include your downloads and login data) with the school or organisation that manages the relevant school membership account. This is normally done by providing the information to the Account Administrator of the relevant school membership account.
4. Marketing and Product Preferences
4.1. We may use account, service and usage data to provide you with information about our products and services. Our purpose is to provide you with a service to help meet your needs. Our lawful basis for processing this data is consent. You are free to withdraw your consent at any time. The consequences might be however, that we cannot offer you certain things, such as offers and promotions or resource alerts, which may be beneficial to you.
4.2.  You may change your preferences or opt-out at any time by either accessing ‘Your Contact Preferences’ within your Twinkl account or by unsubscribing from Twinkl marketing emails by using the 'unsubscribe' link at the end of the email received. Please note that as a Twinkl user or subscriber you are unable to unsubscribe from customer service emails (such as service updates) as these are required to provide our service to you and the lawful basis of processing is contractual or legitimate interests depending on the circumstances.
4.3. If you have signed up for a competition or free gift without being a service subscriber, you may opt-out at any time by using the unsubscribe link at the end of the email received.
5. Our Use Of Cookies and Stored Device Data
Cookies are small text files that are placed on your computer by websites that you visit. They are widely used in order to make websites work, or work more efficiently, as well as to provide information to the owners of the site.
5.1 The Twinkl website uses cookies and stored device data for the following purposes:
Necessary Cookies
: Cookies to ensure the correct technical functionality of the services we provide and you have requested, customise your experience and tailor it to your preferences, optimise global performance, maintain website security, prevent website abuse and ensure legislative/regulatory compliance.
Analytics Cookies
: Cookies that allow us to to use 3rd party services to compile and enrich business data regarding website traffic and activity - for example,
Google Analytics
and
Microsoft Clarity
, to help us to understand our most popular website pages, visit sources and time-of-day traffic. Further, to advertise Twinkl services to you across our website and on 3rd party websites - for example, to market and
remarket Twinkl products and services to you using Google Adwords
.
5.2 To withdraw consent for the use of non-neccesary cookies opt-out via the consent mechanism (globe menu) and/or configure your browser to block cookies. Our website features may not function correctly and/or you may not receive the best website experience if you disable/do not consent to the use of cookies.
5.3 Except as set out at 5.5, below, we use Adwords re-marketing to attract you back to our website with content that may be of interest to you. To do this we advertise using Google search and Google recommended websites. Google may use cookies to track your activity and show you adverts that may be of interest to you and they use this data to show you relevant messages. You are able to opt out of Google using cookies by visiting https://support.google.com/adwords/answer/1752338 and https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated - opting-out of cookies on the Twinkl Website will prevent Google's tracking scripts from running whilst you are using the Twinkl website.
5.4 We use the
reCAPTCHA v3
service provided by
Google
Inc. (Google). This checks if you are a real person in order to prevent spam and abuse of our website when you request our services. Use of reCAPTCHA v3 is subject to Google's Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.
5.5 Third-party analytics are
neither collected nor used
at any time: a) when a Learner is logged in to Twinkl Learner Login; or b) on the log-in pages for Learner Login/Twinkl Go.
6. How We Protect Your Personal Data
6.1. We have put in place a number of security procedures and technical organisational measures to safeguard your personal data. These measures are reviewed regularly and updated when necessary in order for us to meet business needs and in accordance with changes in technology and regulatory requirements.
Examples of procedures and technical and organisational measures:
We train and take steps to ensure our employees operate in accordance with our information security policies, procedures and applicable contractual conditions.
We have measures in place to protect against accidental loss and unauthorised access, use, destruction or disclosure of data. Some examples are: staff screening, encryption and hashing; firewalling and content filtering; virus/malware scanning and protection; vulnerability scanning; multi-factor authentication; pseudonymization; logging, monitoring, inventory and auditing; secure design; privacy impact assessments, physical security controls; system authentication/role-based access control, high availability configuration and regular backups.
We have a business continuity and disaster recovery strategy that is designed to safeguard the continuity of Twinkl’s service and to protect you and your data.
6.2. We will use all reasonable efforts to safeguard your personal data. However, you should be aware that the use of the Internet is not entirely secure and for this reason we cannot guarantee the security or integrity of any personal data which is transferred from you or to you via the Internet.
7. Overseas Transfers
7.1. The personal data you provide may be transferred to countries outside the United Kingdom and the European Economic Area ('EEA') that do not have similar protections in place regarding your data and restrictions on its use as set out in this Privacy Policy. However, transfers outside of the UK and EEA will be protected by us imposing appropriate safeguards, namely the use of standard data protection clauses adopted or approved by the European Commission to ensure the security of your data or via, independent privacy schemes approved by regulators.
7.2. The EEA comprises the EU member states plus Norway, Iceland and Liechtenstein. By submitting your data, you consent to these transfers for the purposes specified above.
8. Your Rights Under Applicable Data Protection Law
8.1. Your rights in respect to how we process your personal data are set out in the table below. Please note that some of these rights only apply in certain circumstances.
Your rights
Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) Guidance
The right to be informed about the collection and use of your personal data.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-be-informed/
The right to have inaccurate personal data rectified or completed if it is incomplete.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-rectification/
The right to have your personal data erased in certain circumstances.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-erasure/
The right to object to the processing of personal data in certain circumstances.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-object/
The right to request the restriction or suppression of your personal data
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-restrict-processing/
The right to access your personal data.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-of-access/
The right to obtain and reuse your personal data for your own purpose across different services.
https://ico.org.uk/for-organisations/guide-to-the-general-data-protection-regulation-gdpr/individual-rights/right-to-data-portability/
The right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority. In the UK, this is the Information Commissioner’s Office.
https://ico.org.uk/make-a-complaint/
8.2. We respect and value your right to access and control your data. You can exercise your rights, subject to appropriate identity verification procedures, in the following ways:
- By amending your data or consent within your Service account area;
- By contacting our
TwinklCares
customer services team using httlis://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us;
- By sending a letter to The Data Protection Officer, Twinkl Global HQ, Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom
8.3. We take your rights seriously and want you to feel confident that we are handling your personal data responsibly and in line with good practice. You can seek further information, or raise a concern to us using any of the following ways:
By contacting our
TwinklCares
customer services team using https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us;
By sending a letter to The Data Protection Officer, Twinkl Global HQ, Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom
9. Data Retention
9.1. We retain personal data for as long as we reasonably require it for legal or business purposes. When determining data retention periods, we take into consideration applicable laws, contractual obligations and the expectations and requirements of our customers. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or destroy it.
9.2. If you have signed up for competitions and/or free giveaways and are not registered for and use our services, data will be retained for 30 days after the prizes or giveaways have been dispatched unless you have consented to being contacted for more information on Twinkl services or for receiving marketing emails.
10. Sale Of Business
10.1. If Twinkl Ltd. is sold or integrated with another business your personal data may be disclosed to our advisers, or any prospective purchasers and their advisers, and will be passed on to the new owners of the business.
11. Your Consent
11.1. By using or interacting with our service, or by signing up to competitions and free giveaways, you are consenting to:
the use of cookies and other technologies;
the transfer of your data outside of the country where you live;
the transfer of your data outside of the European Economic Area;
the collection, use, sharing, and other processing of your information as described in this Privacy Policy.
11.2. In each case, you consent to the processing of data by Twinkl Ltd., as data controller. If you don't agree with the terms of this Privacy Policy, then please don't use our service.
11.3. Where the lawful basis of processing your data is consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. To withdraw your consent, please contact our Data Protection Officer using the details below.
12. How do we use social media?
12.1 We may use social media and social networking services for promoting our business, communicating with you and supporting the teaching community. In order to do this, we require the use of third party service providers, such as Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, Instagram, and YouTube.
12.2 Our social media pages, groups, feeds and channels are administered by these third parties:
Our Facebook page is administered by Facebook, in accordance with Facebook's Data Policy available
here
, and is accessible by Facebook users who have already consented to Facebook's Data Policy.
Our Twitter account is administered by Twitter, in accordance with Twitter's Privacy Policy available
here
.
Our Instagram account is administered by Instagram in accordance with Instagram’s Privacy Policy available
here
.
Our YouTube channel is administered by YouTube, in accordance with their privacy policy available
here
.
Our LinkedIn page is administered by LinkedIn, in accordance with their privacy policy available
here
.
12.3 We may message you directly through social media when you contact us through these platforms. Our lawful basis is that of consent..
12.4 We may export your social media profile information or content (such as your name or social media username) to our own systems if there is a reasonable need to do so. This could include exporting an individual’s name and social media username to our systems in order to review and record whether they have broken our social media page or group rules. Our purpose is to effectively manage our social media platforms and ensure that they are managed in accordance with our social media group and page rules. Our lawful grounds are based on legitimate interests. Our legitimate interests are to protect our business, employees, sub-contractors and followers.
Protecting our Intellectual Property Rights
12.5 In order to protect our intellectual property, our brand and business, we may collect or use your personal details where we have reason to believe that you or any organisation you represent is infringing on our intellectual property rights. We may obtain your personal details from:-
you or your organisation’s website or social media profiles,
Companies House,
The Charities Commission,
The Intellectual Property Office,
Other public body,
Social media,
Any other publicly listed source.
12.6 Your details may be provided by other third parties including other organisations, Twinkl users, social media users or members of the general public.
12.7 We may use your personal information to:-
review any potential infringement of our intellectual property;
provide you with a cease and desist communication;
take legal action or notify a third party that our intellectual property rights are being infringed.
12.8 Our lawful grounds are based on legitimate interest. Our legitimate interest is to protect our business.
13. Identify and Contact Details of the Data Controller and Data Protection Officer
13.1. Twinkl Ltd. of Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW is the Data Controller. You can contact the Data Controller using a variety of methods found here: https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us. Our Data Protection Officer can be contacted at the address of the Data Controller or by email at
dpo@twinkl.co.uk
.
13.2. Alternatively, for individuals based in the EEA our Designated Representative is: Twinkl Ireland and can be contacted at Ground Floor 8-9 Marino Mart Fairview, Clontarf, Dublin 3, Ireland or by email at
TwinklRepresentative@twinkl.co.uk
.
14. Changes to this Policy
14.1. We keep this policy under regular review. If we change the content of our Privacy Policy we will post the changes on this page.
Copyright
By downloading any resources from Twinkl (whether free or Premium), you agree to the following:
You may use resources for personal and/or direct classroom use only.
In order to support us, we ask that you always acknowledge www.twinkl.co.uk as the source of the resource. If you love our resources, why not let others know about Twinkl?
You must not reproduce or share this resource with others in any form. You may not use your account to download and print for anyone else, as this breaches the account usage licence.
You must not host or in any other way share our resources directly with others, without the prior written permission of Twinkl's CEO.
You must not use any product for commercial purposes and also you must not alter the digital versions of our products in any way.
You must not use any product or resource to train, validate, test, or otherwise model any artificial intelligence application, or upload any product or resource to any such system or platform.
You acknowledge that the product you download will remain the property of Twinkl Ltd at all times and you agree to our general site Terms and Conditions.
If you have any questions about our copyright policy, or to discuss any of the above, please email us:
copyright@twinkl.co.uk
.
Please note that we take the copying of any part of our resources
very seriously
, given that we invest heavily in our team to produce the highest quality resources.
Terms and Conditions
Last revised on 29th July 2024
These user terms and conditions ("Terms and Conditions) may be updated by Us from time to time without notice to You. We will post any revisions to these Terms and Conditions on this page and We will also indicate at the top of this page the date that these Terms and Conditions were last revised.
By browsing and using www.twinkl.co.uk - or any Twinkl geographical domain - (the 'Website' which shall include the placing of orders and subscriptions), You are agreeing to comply with and be bound by the following Terms and Conditions of use, which govern the relationship between You and Twinkl Limited.
Your use of the service or this Website after any revisions have been made constitutes Your acceptance of the new Terms and Conditions. If You do not agree to abide by these or any new Terms and Conditions, do not use or access (or continue to use or access) the service or this Website. It is Your responsibility to regularly check this page to determine if there have been changes to these Terms and Conditions and to consider such changes.
You should print a copy of these Terms and Conditions for future reference and You should also regularly revisit the Terms and Conditions on the Website for purposes of noting whether or not revisions have been made.
Who we are
1.1 Twinkl is the trading name of Twinkl Limited of Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom. Twinkl Limited is registered in England and Wales under company no. 07201458.
1.2. The term "Twinkl", "We" and "Us", shall mean Twinkl Limited, the owner of this Website. The term "You", "Yourself" and "Your" refers to the user or viewer of this Website.
1.3. Twinkl is the Data Controller within the definition of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
The services
2.1 Twinkl is a provider of high quality teaching resources - we call this the 'Service'. Our resources are primarily distributed through the Website.
2.2 Twinkl sells physical products and we call this the 'Product Service' which is made available through the Website.
2.3 Twinkl provides a range of resource membership services upon payment of a fee as specified on the Website or chargeable in some other way may be purchased. We call this the ‘Membership Service’.
2.4 Twinkl provides a support community forum service and we call this the ‘Forum Service’ which is made available through the Website.
2.5 We reserve the right to change pricing and or availability in respect of any of the services in this clause for any reason and without notice.
2.6 Twinkl is not responsible for non-delivery or technical limitations of the end user for any reason in respect of any of the services in this clause. You are strongly advised to read our
help and support FAQ
.
Member accounts
3.1 Certain aspects of the Services may require You to register and provide information about Yourself. You agree to: (a) provide true, accurate, current and complete information about Yourself as prompted by the relevant registration form contained on the Website (such information being the Registration Data) and (b) maintain and promptly update the Registration Data (by emailing Us) to keep it true, accurate, current and complete and We shall not be liable for any loss suffered by Your non-compliance with this provision.
3.2 Your privacy is incredibly important to us. You can find additional information in our
Privacy Policy
.
3.3 The registration processes will involve You providing a password and We shall provide You with a designated account. You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of the password and account and are fully responsible for all activities that occur under Your password or account. You agree to (a) immediately notify Twinkl of any unauthorised use of Your password or account and any other breach of security, and (b) ensure that You exit from Your account at the end of each session. Twinkl cannot and will not be liable for any loss or damage arising from Your failure to comply with this obligation.
3.4 Your member account is strictly for your personal use only and you may not use your account to download and print for anyone else. Twinkl does not allow volume printing arrangements, unless specifically agreed in writing (these will be individually negotiated).
3.5 Your member account is subject to an acceptable use policy in accordance with the Terms and Conditions. We will monitor and may temporarily restrict accounts which have high download volumes. If your account is subject to investigation due to high downloads under our acceptable use policy, you may contact us to request reactivation of your account. If we consider that your use of the member account is in breach of our Terms and Conditions, we may terminate the agreement in accordance with clause 11.
Delivery of Digital Resources
3.6 All resources available on the Website are digital products and downloadable via digital download only unless otherwise specified. No physical products are shipped for digital resources.
3.7 Downloads of digital resources are made available directly from the Website to signed-in members and are made subject to these terms and conditions.
Your conduct
4.1 You can contribute to Twinkl in a variety of ways, including (but not limited to) the request and create a resource, forum, calendar events, book list suggestions and in addition, on most pages of the Website you are capable of posting comments for lawful, relevant, fair and appropriate opinion. You acknowledge that all information, data (including registration data), text, software, music, sound, photographs, graphics, video, messages and other materials ("Content"), whether publicly posted or privately transmitted, are the sole responsibility of the person from which such Content originated.
4.2 Twinkl accepts no responsibility for, and does not guarantee, the accuracy, integrity or quality of any Content placed on our Website (in any manner specified in Clause 4.1 or otherwise) by you or any third party.
4.3 You acknowledge that by using the Service, there is a risk that you may be exposed to Content that you may find offensive, indecent or objectionable. Please see the section below titled "Content Problems" for details of how to report such Content.
4.4 If you breach these Terms and Conditions, you should be aware that a party aggrieved by the uploading of any content which is, inter alia, defamatory or in breach of copyright, may take action and that this could result in registration data and other data concerning your identity being disclosed and your having to pay compensation to the person or company aggrieved.
4.5 You agree to not use the Service to:
4.5.1 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any Content that is unlawful, harmful, objectionable, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortuous, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically or otherwise discriminatory; harm or attempt to harm minors in any way;
4.5.2 impersonate any person or entity, including, but not limited to, a Twinkl staff member, forum moderator, guide or host, or falsely state or otherwise misrepresent your affiliation with a person or entity;
4.5.3 forge headers or otherwise manipulate identifiers in order to disguise the origin of any Content transmitted through the Service;
4.5.4 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any Content that you do not have a right to transmit under any law or under contractual or fiduciary relationships (such as inside information, proprietary and confidential information learned or disclosed as part of employment relationships or under nondisclosure agreements);
4.5.5 enter into any of our email lists an email address that is not your own where you know (or ought reasonably to know) that the recipient of the email would not wish to be contacted by Us;
4.5.6 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any Content that infringes any patent, trade mark, trade secret, copyright or other proprietary rights ("Rights") of any party;
4.5.7 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any unsolicited or unauthorised advertising, promotional materials, "junk mail," "spam," "chain letters," "pyramid schemes," or any other form of solicitation, except in those areas that are designated for such purpose;
4.5.8 upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any material that contains software viruses or any other computer code, files or programs designed to interrupt, damage, destroy or limit the functionality of any computer software or hardware or telecommunications equipment;
4.5.9 disrupt the normal flow of dialogue, cause a screen to "scroll" faster than other users of the Service are able to type, or otherwise act in a manner that negatively affects other users' ability to engage in real time exchanges;
4.5.10 interfere with or disrupt the Service or servers or networks connected to the Service, or disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or regulations of networks connected to the Service;
4.5.11 intentionally or unintentionally violate any applicable law or regulation;
4.5.12 collect or store personal data about other users;
4.5.13 post content which refers to individual schools, colleges or agencies - or their staff - whether by name, or identifiable by a pseudonym or any other means; and/or
4.5.14 advertise any job vacancies in any area of the Website unless We expressly agree that you may do so.
4.6 You acknowledge that Twinkl does not pre-screen Content that you post on the Website, but that Twinkl and people designated by it shall have the right (but not the obligation) to monitor communications that occur through, and posts made to, the Website. If Twinkl determines, in its sole discretion, that you or another user have breached these Terms and Conditions or that any Content is inappropriate or otherwise objectionable, Twinkl may refuse to accept or may remove any Content from the Website, without any liability to you or a third party.
Indemnity
5.1 You agree to indemnify, defend and hold Twinkl Limited and its affiliates harmless from and against any and all liability, losses, costs, claims and expenses incurred directly or indirectly (including reasonable legal fees) incurred in connection with or arising out of your violation of these Terms and Conditions, any applicable law or regulation or the rights of any third parties related to the use of the Content, our Website, Service and tools. This indemnity includes both any liability to third parties, and other costs and losses incurred by Twinkl Limited.
Special warning for international use
6.1 The Website is designed to be compliant with the applicable laws and regulations of England and Wales. Due to the global nature of the Internet, users from all over the world will have access to the Website, however if you are resident in a country outside of the United Kingdom you use the Website at your own risk.
Rights in posted content on the Website
7.1 With respect to all Content you post on the Website, you grant Twinkl Limited a royalty-free, perpetual, irrevocable, non-exclusive and fully sub-licensable right and licence to use, reproduce, modify, adapt, publish, translate, create derivative works from, distribute, perform and display such Content (in whole or part) worldwide and/or to incorporate it in other works in any form, media, or technology now known or later developed. With respect to all Content you post to the Website, you hereby waive any moral rights you have in the Content. You agree to perform all further acts necessary to perfect any of the above rights granted by you to Twinkl Limited, including the execution of deeds and documents, at our request.
7.2 You represent and warrant that you own or otherwise control all of the rights to the Content and can grant the rights set out above. You represent, warrant and undertake that: (i) the work submitted is your own (ii) the Content will not infringe the rights of any third parties (including that the Content or material is not defamatory); and (iii) you have obtained all rights and consents that are necessary for you to provide the Content; and (iv) you will immediately remove and notify us of any Content that does not does not comply with these Terms and Conditions or may infringe the rights of third parties. You agree to indemnify Twinkl Limited for all claims brought by a third party against Twinkl Limited in respect of infringement of that third party's intellectual property rights or arising out of or in connection with a breach of any of these warranties. Twinkl Limited reserves the right to refuse to host any content that has been made in the course of business and in any respect, asserts its right to host Content entirely at its own discretion.
Content problems
8.1 If you object to the publication of any material placed in any area of the Website, please let us know by clicking on the 'Report' link next to the relevant post/message. This is the fastest way to notify us and will provide to us a direct link to the post/message in question.
8.2 If you object to anything on the Website, please let us know by sending an email to
help@twinkl.co.uk
and we will take whatever action we deem appropriate.
8.3 Twinkl will always immediately correct content where mistakes are found, but We do not guarantee the accuracy of any content provided, and it is for You to verify and be satisfied with the material you download. Twinkl provides and information service and You accept that We take no responsibility for the way You use the information you download.
General practices regarding use and storage
9.1 You acknowledge that Twinkl may establish general practices and limits concerning use of the Service, including without limitation the maximum number of days that message postings or other uploaded Content will be retained by the Service and the maximum number of times (and the maximum duration for which) you may access the Service in a given period of time.
9.2 You agree that Twinkl has no responsibility or liability for the deletion or failure to store any messages and other communications or other Content maintained or transmitted by the Service.
9.3 You acknowledge that Twinkl reserves the right to de-activate accounts that are inactive for an extended period of time.
9.4 You acknowledge that Twinkl reserves the right to change these general practices and limits at any time, in its sole discretion, with or without notice.
9.5 You agree to use using your usage data to provide rewards and incentives either randomly or as part of a programme and you agree to us publicly publishing your success in achieving these rewards or incentives.
9.6 Any rewards or incentives are provided at Twinkl's discretion and may be added, removed or cancelled at any time for any reason at Twinkl's sole and absolute discretion.
9.7 Any reward or incentive programmes are provided at Twinkl's discretion and may be added, removed or cancelled at any time for any reason at Twinkl's sole and absolute discretion.
9.8 Where your access to the Service is granted under a School Membership account, you agree that we may share your usage data (which shall include your downloads and login data) with the school or organisation that manages the relevant School Membership account. This is normally done by providing the information to the Account Administrator of the relevant School Membership account.
Modifications to service
10.1 Twinkl reserves the right at any time and from time to time to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, the Service (or any part thereof) with or without notice.
10.2 You agree that Twinkl shall not be liable to you or to any third party for any modification, suspension or discontinuance of the Service.
Termination
11.1 You agree that Twinkl, in its sole discretion and without liability to you or any third party, may suspend or terminate, with or without notice, the Website and/or the Service or any part of it or any of your passwords or accounts (or any part(s) thereof or related files and information) within the Service, and may remove and discard any Content within the Service, for any reason, including, without limitation, for lack of use or if Twinkl Limited believes that you have violated or acted inconsistently with the letter or spirit of these Terms and Conditions.
11.2 Where there is a breach of these Terms and Conditions, the rights described in this paragraph are not Twinkl's only remedy and Twinkl may take any other action we reasonably deem appropriate in connection with such breach.
Dealing with advertisers and other suppliers
12.1 Your dealings with advertisers, merchants and any other third party found on or through the Service, including payment and delivery of related goods or services, and any other terms, conditions, warranties or representations associated with such dealings, are solely between you and such third party.
12.2 To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, you agree that: (a) Twinkl Limited shall not be responsible or liable for any loss or damage of any kind incurred as the result of any such dealings or as the result of the presence of such advertisers and merchants on the Service or the Website, and (b) any orders placed by you on, and any product specifications and product availability appearing on, the Service or the Website are subject to confirmation by, and are supplied subject to the terms and conditions of business of, the relevant merchant.
Links to other websites or resources
13.1 The Service may provide, or third parties may provide, links to other websites or resources. As Twinkl has no control over these sites and resources, you acknowledge and agree that Twinkl is not responsible for the availability of such external sites or resources, and does not endorse and is not responsible or liable for any Content, advertising, products, or other materials on or available from such sites or resources.
13.2 You acknowledge and agree that Twinkl shall not be responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with use of or reliance on any such Content, goods or services available on or through any such site or resource.
Use of Twinkl materials
14.1 All articles, information and other materials presented on the Website are subject to
copyright
, trade mark right and/or other intellectual property right owned by or licensed to Twinkl Limited. You are prohibited from reproducing, extracting, providing links to or otherwise communicating or making available to third parties any part of the content of this Website or any resources therein without Twinkl Limited's written consent. You acknowledge that, by making use of this Website, you are agreeing to comply with this prohibition and that any breach thereof is likely to result in legal proceedings being issued against you.
14.2 For the avoidance of doubt and to make the provision contained in 14.1 clear, you are not permitted to share any Twinkl materials or illustrations on any digital platform of any kind without the prior written consent of Twinkl's CEO.
14.3 You must not use any material downloaded or otherwise sourced from the Website for the purposes of:
14.3.1 training, validating, testing, or modelling of any system which uses artificial intelligence technology; or
14.3.2 rephrasing, rewriting, redesigning, recreating, altering, or otherwise manipulating such material or any part thereof through the use of any system, including any platform or service which uses or incorporates any artificial intelligence technology.
14.4 Such material must not be uploaded or otherwise provided to any artificial intelligence service without Twinkl’s express written permission.
14.5 You acknowledge that all materials You download remain the property of Twinkl Limited in perpetuity.
14.6 Twinkl strictly forbids the use of any scripted or otherwise automated method of content or website access, including but not limited to training any machine learning or artificial intelligence system.
Disclaimers
15.1 You expressly acknowledge and agree that:
15.1.1 The content of the pages of the Website is for your general information and use only. It is subject to change without notice.
15.1.2 Your use of the Service is at your sole risk. Twinkl has made every effort to ensure that the Content on the Website and made available through the Service is accurate and up-to-date and correct at the time of publication. However, the Website and the Service are provided on an 'as is' and 'as available' basis. We do not guarantee the accuracy, timeliness, completeness or fitness for purpose of the Content provided on the Website or through the Service or that use of the Website will be uninterrupted, virus free or error-free. No responsibility is accepted by or on behalf of Twinkl for any errors, omissions or inaccurate information on the Website or available through the Service.
15.1.3 Neither Twinkl nor any third parties provide any warranty or guarantee as to the accuracy, timeliness, performance, completeness or suitability of the information and materials found or offered on the Website for any particular purpose. You acknowledge that such information and materials may contain inaccuracies or errors and we expressly exclude liability for any such inaccuracies or errors to the fullest extent permitted by law.
15.1.4 Unauthorised use of the Website may give rise to a claim for damages and/or be a criminal offence.
15.1.5 From time to time the Website may also include links to other websites. These links are provided for your convenience to provide further information. They do not signify that Twinkl endorses the website(s) and Twinkl has no responsibility for the content of the linked website(s).
15.1.6 The Content on the Website and made available through the Service is for general information only and is not intended to, nor does it, constitute legal or other professional advice or services or a recommendation to purchase any product or service upon which a specific decision should be made. The information, Content of the Website and Service do not address your particular circumstances and accordingly you should not rely upon the Content of the Website or the Service as a substitute for proper professional advice.
15.1.7 Twinkl is not responsible for how the Content on the Website or available through the Service is used, is interpreted or what reliance is placed on it. We do not accept any responsibility for the results of any action taken on the basis of the information provided on the Website or available through the Service. It shall be your own responsibility to ensure that any products, services or information available through this Website meet your specific requirements.
15.1.8 Any material downloaded or otherwise obtained through the use of the Service is done at your own discretion and risk and you will be solely responsible for any damage to your computer system or loss of data that results from the download of any such material.
15.1.9 No advice or information, whether oral or written, obtained by you from Twinkl shall create any warranty or other obligation not expressly stated in these Terms and Conditions.
Availability of the Website
16.1 Twinkl has an excellent record of uptime and availability of the Website. We do not, however, guarantee that the Website will operate continuously without interruptions or be error free and Twinkl therefore accepts no liability for its unavailability.
16.2 You must not attempt to interfere with the proper working of the Website and, in particular, you must not attempt to circumvent security, tamper with, hack into, or otherwise disrupt any computer system, server, Website, router or any other internet connection device.
Limitations of liability
17.1 Twinkl Limited's liability to you in contract, tort (including negligence) with regard to these Terms and Conditions, use of the Website and/or any Service shall be limited the greater of: (a) £150 and (b) the price paid by you to Twinkl Limited under any Contract during the 3 months preceding the event giving rise to the claim.
17.2 You expressly acknowledge and agree that Twinkl Limited shall not be liable for any indirect, incidental, special, consequential or exemplary damages, nor for direct or indirect loss of profits revenue, business, anticipated savings, goodwill, opportunity, reputation, business interruption, use, data or intangible losses even if Twinkl Limited has been advised of the possibility of such damage.
17.3 Nothing in these Terms and Conditions shall affect the statutory rights of any consumer or exclude or restrict any liability for fraud or for death or personal injury arising from the negligence of Twinkl Limited.
Events outside of our control
18.1 Twinkl will not be liable or responsible for any failure to perform, or delay in performance of, any of our obligations under these Terms and Conditions or any Contract that is caused by events outside our reasonable control ("Force Majeure Event"). A Force Majeure Event includes any act, event, non-happening, omission or accident beyond our reasonable control and includes in particular (without limitation) the following:
18.1.1 Strikes, lock-outs or other industrial action.
18.1.2 Civil commotion, riot, invasion, terrorist attack or threat of terrorist attack, war (whether declared or not) or threat or preparation for war.
18.1.3 Fire, explosion, storm, flood, earthquake, subsidence, epidemic or other natural disaster.
18.1.4 Impossibility of the use of railways, shipping, aircraft, motor transport or other means of public or private transport.
18.1.5 Impossibility of the use of public or private telecommunications networks.
18.1.6 The acts, decrees, legislation, regulations or restrictions of any government.
18.1.7 Viruses and cyber attacks
18.1.8 Power or other failure affecting any part of our servers, premises or any other part of our service
18.2 Twinkl Limited's performance under any Terms and Conditions or any Contract is deemed to be suspended for the period that the Force Majeure Event continues, and we will have an extension of time for performance during that period. We will use our reasonable endeavours to bring the Force Majeure Event to a close or to find a solution by which our obligations under the Terms and Conditions or any Contract may be performed despite the Force Majeure Event.
Twinkl Membership for Individuals
19.1 The Twinkl Membership Service is subject to these Terms and Conditions and in an addition the following conditions shall apply to this service:
19.1.1 Twinkl makes available the Membership Service by way of a subscription to You upon payment of a fee as specified from time to time on the Website.
19.1.2 In accordance with the general Terms and Conditions, Your user and account username and password will not be shared with anyone.
19.1.3 In accordance with our
Copyright Terms
, You will not redistribute any resources downloaded through the Membership Service and You understand that any resources You download from the Website whether through the Membership Service or otherwise are for Your personal use only.
19.1.4 You have explicitly read and agree to abide by the Twinkl
Copyright Terms
.
19.1.5 You understand and agree to the Membership Service Acceptable Use Policy, as detailed in clause 20.
19.1.6 You agree that a breach of any of the general Terms and Conditions will lead to Your access to the Membership Service being immediately suspended. It is at Twinkl's absolute discretion as to whether Your account will be reinstated.
19.1.7 You understand and agree that We will monitor Your usage of the Service to allow us to determine whether a violation has, or is, occurring.
19.1.8 A subscription to the Membership Service can only be purchased directly from Twinkl by (1) paying a monthly subscription fee; (“Monthly Subscriptions”) or (2) pre-payment giving You access to the Twinkl Membership Service for a specific time period (“Pre-Paid Subscriptions”). Twinkl retains the absolute right at their complete discretion to offer Monthly Subscriptions in certain countries for certain periods of time or Pre-Paid Subscriptions in certain countries for certain periods of time.
19.1.9 When You register for the Twinkl Membership Service, You consent to get access to Twinkl Membership Service immediately.
19.1.10 For the purposes of this clause 19,
‘access premium content
’ means access, via download or access via the Twinkl website or apps, any content which Twinkl makes available only to users of the Membership Service, including, but not limited to: a) downloading any resource(s); b) use of Twinkl Go; c) use of Twinkl Symbols; d) use of any AI tool; and d) use of Learner Login.
19.1.11 You may cancel your subscription for the Membership Service at your convenience by
contacting the Twinkl Cares team
.
Your refund options and how long you'll have access to the Membership Service after cancellation are as follows:
Monthly Subscriptions
Criteria
Refund
Membership Service (including access)
Active free trial promotional pricing offer
NA
Ends on expiry of the free trial promotional pricing period
Cancelled
within
14 days
of first monthly payment; and
Not accessed premium content
Yes - Full refund
Ends on the date of cancellation
14+ days after first monthly payment
No
Ends after expiry of the current billing period
Pre-Paid Subscriptions
Criteria
Refund
Membership Service (including access)
Active free trial promotional pricing offer; and
Not accessed premium content
NA
Ends on expiry of the free trial promotional pricing period
Cancelled
within
30 days
of sign-up; and
Not accessed premium content
Yes - Full refund
Ends on the date of cancellation
Cancelled
within
the first calendar month
of sign-up
Yes - Full refund minus fees paid for the current billing period
Ends at the end of the current calendar month
Cancelled
after the first calendar month, but before the end of the second calendar month
after sign-up
Yes - For fees paid in respect of the period after the current calendar month
Ends at the end of the current calendar month
Cancelled
after the second calendar month
No
Ends at the end of the annual billing period
19.1.12 You acknowledge that by accessing premium content, you are waiving your right to a 14-day cooling-off period under regulation 29(1) of the Consumer Contracts Regulations 2013. This means that you will not be entitled to a refund once you have accessed premium content using the Membership Service.
19.1.13 In relation to Monthly Subscriptions, You will be charged the rate stated at the time of purchase, every month until You or We cancel it. Any download limits referred to at point of purchase will expire at the end of your current month's term of membership. The limit will refresh when the next payment is made. Any limits implied bear no influence on the terms of our Acceptable Use Policy as detailed in Clause 20.
19.1.14 In relation to a Pre-Paid (Annual) Subscription, You will be charged at the time of purchase the equivalent monthly rate stated at the time of purchase multiplied by 12 (the 'Minimum Term'). At the end of the Minimum Term, Your Membership Service contract will, at our sole and absolute discretion, either renew automatically for another 12 months until You or We cancel it or it will not automatically renew and Your access to the Membership Service will cease until You take the actions prescribed by Us to renew Your Membership Service.  If Your Membership Service renews automatically, at the end of Your first Minimum Term We may charge You, at our sole and absolute discretion, the rate You paid when You first subscribed to the Membership Service or the then current annual rate for the Membership Service level you have access to. If You renew Your Membership Service before the end of the Minimum Term, Your renewed Membership Service will be extended to include, if any, the months which were remaining on your previous Membership Service Subscription.
19.1.15 Twinkl may change the price for the Monthly Subscriptions and Pre-Paid Subscriptions and we will communicate this change to you either at renewal, or in respect of Monthly Subscriptions, at the point the new price is in use.
19.1.16 For your safety, credit/debit card details are not stored nor shared with third parties. Payment transactions are processed via PayPal, Stripe or other secure third party payment providers and You are encouraged to read the terms and conditions for any financial transactions with either of these companies. In short, we value your safety as highly as we would our own.
19.1.17 As per Clause 14.2, You acknowledge that all content remains the property of Twinkl at all times. You also understand that your purchasing of a Twinkl Membership package constitutes a licence for the use of Twinkl material for the duration of the subscription only.
19.1.18 Any resources downloaded may not be shared or otherwise hosted on any networked system. Resources are for the single and sole use of the person downloading them and any replication or sharing of resources (without written permission of the CEO) will result in Twinkl Ltd taking action to protect its rights under the licence stipulated in 19.1.17.
19.1.19 You may sign up for a promotional pricing offer available from time to time. Any such offer shall be subject to Twinkl's
Promotional Offer Terms and Conditions
.
Membership Service Acceptable Use Policy
20.1 The Membership Service is designed to allow individual users to download additional teaching resources for their own needs. Collectively, the Twinkl resource collection has taken many years to create.
20.2 The Membership Service is subject to an acceptable use policy, and user accounts are monitored. Twinkl will monitor your number of downloads, frequency of downloads, contents of downloads, your frequency of access, your location of access (IP address and device). Twinkl considers that no individual user would reasonably need to download large quantities of resources, crossing an extensive range of age groups, topics and specialisms, from a wide variety of locations and devices. If your account is subject to investigation under our acceptable use policy, you may contact us to request reactivation of your account in accordance with clause 3.5.
20.3 The Membership Service allows the Twinkl community to support the hard work of the Twinkl staff in helping those who teach. As such, any violation of the terms of Clause 19 or 20.2 is taken seriously and the user's account may be suspended immediately to allow for further investigation. If we remain unsatisfied that your account is being used solely for your own needs we may suspend your membership indefinitely.
Membership Service gift vouchers
21.1 The Membership Service can also be purchased by way of gift voucher through the Website.
21.2 A gift voucher purchase is subject to the terms of clause 21.3 but additionally to all provisions of clause 19 (notably clause 19.1.8).
21.3 A gift voucher will be delivered to You electronically at the point of payment and must be used within one (1) year of the date and time of purchase. If it is not used within this time period it will expire and You will no longer be able to make use of it.
Product Service
22.1 The Product Service allows You to purchase physical products directly from the Website and have them delivered to You.
22.2 Unless we agree otherwise, when you place an Order through the Website or otherwise, the price You pay will include first class postage to UK mainland addresses only. If You are ordering from overseas, we are happy to process the order, but will charge and additional postage surcharge.
22.3 When You place an order with us, this is technically an Offer from you, to us. We will deem to have accepted this offer when the Order has been processed and the product posted. We reserve the right to cancel any order for any reason and will refund you your money if we do so.
22.4 We aim to process and send out Your order as quickly as possible. This will usually be the same day, but it may take up to five days to process.
22.5 Please ensure that you check the address you have set up in PayPal as your postal address. We are not responsible for any orders sent to the wrong address, where you have not informed us of a change of address within 2 hours of placing your order.
22.6 If the product(s) provided under the Product Service are not what You ordered or the delivery is of an incorrect quantity, We shall have no liability to You unless You notify Us in writing at our contact address of the problem within 5 working days of the delivery of the service in question.
22.7 If You notify a problem to Us under clause 22.6 above, our only obligation will be, at Your option:
22.7.1 to make good any shortage or non-delivery;
22.7.2 to repair and resend any products that are damaged or defective.
22.8 Save as precluded by law, We will not be liable to You for any indirect or consequential loss, damage or expenses (including loss of profits, business or goodwill) howsoever arising out of any problem You notify to Us under this contract and We shall have no liability to pay any money to You by way of compensation other than to refund to You the amount paid by You for the relevant order.
22.9 You must observe and comply with all applicable regulations and legislation, including obtaining all necessary customs, import or other permits to purchase the Services from our site. The importation or exportation of certain goods may be prohibited by certain national laws. We make no representation and accept no liability in respect of the export or import of the products under the service You purchase.
Forum Service
23.1 The forum service is subject to our Forum Community
House Rules
and our
Forum Etiquette
. Please note that a breach of either of these sets of rules is likely to result in the suspension of your service and an indefinite ban.
Create Service
24.1 The Twinkl Create service (hosted at www.twinkl.co.uk/create) is subject to these Terms and Conditions and in an addition the following conditions shall apply to this service:
24.1.1 Twinkl makes available the Create Service to You upon payment of a fee as specified from time to time on the Website.
24.1.2 In accordance with the general Terms and Conditions, Your User and account username and password will not be shared with anyone.
24.1.3 Your use of the Create service is a request by You, to Us, to create a specified resource for You. We may decide to use the Create service to fulfill this request, but You may also assist Us by creating the resource yourself using the Create Service. In this regard, You understand that by using the Create service, You are producing products for Twinkl Ltd and not for your own personal use. Once your product has been created, we may, at our discretion, allow You to access the resource after our approval.
24.1.4 You may share resources created through the Create Service for educational use only but you may not sell these resources. When you share these resources, you must not remove the Twinkl logo.
24.1.5 You have explicitly read and agree to abide by the Twinkl Copyright Terms.
24.1.6 All resources you produce through the Create service are the ownership of Twinkl Ltd absolutely and you further consent to Clause 7.2 of these Terms and Conditions.
24.1.7 You agree that a breach of any of the general Terms and Conditions will lead to Your access to the Create Service being immediately suspended. It is at Twinkl's absolute discretion as to whether Your account will be reinstated.
24.1.8 You understand and agree that we will monitor Your usage of the Service to allow us to determine whether a violation has, or is, occurring.
24.1.9 Due to the electronic nature of the subscription, you understand and agree that we are unable to offer refunds under any circumstance.
24.1.10 You agree that Anything which is uploaded within the Twinkl website is dealt with in accordance with our Privacy Policy. By uploading personally identifiable information (e.g. photographs and class lists), you agree that you have permission to do so. Misuse of this service, including uploading inappropriate or offensive content will not be tolerated.
Intellectual property
25.1 The contents of the Website are protected by international copyright laws and other intellectual property rights. The owner of these rights is Twinkl Limited or other third party licensors. All product and company names and logos mentioned in our Website are the trade marks, service marks or trading names of their respective owners including us.
25.2 Any material or information downloaded from this Website is subject to Copyright Terms. Except as stated in this clause, You may not modify, copy, reproduce, republish, upload, post, transmit or distribute, by any means or in any manner, any material or information downloaded from this Website without prior written authorisation from a director of Twinkl Limited. You may modify any resource that has been provided in an editable format to meet the needs of your learners, but you may not copy, reproduce, republish, upload, post, transmit or distribute, by any means or in any manner the same.
Notices
26.1 Unless otherwise expressly stated in these Terms and Conditions, all notices from You to Us must be in writing and sent to our contact address at Twinkl Limited, Wards Exchange, 195-199 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, United Kingdom.
26.2 Notices from Us to You may be in writing or electronic format (to include both email and notice via the Website).
Age Restrictions
27.1 You must be over 18 to take out a subscription to the Membership Service or register as a free user of the website.
27.2 An individual under 18 may use the website if they have the consent of their parent or guardian or their teacher if they are using the website in an educational context. By allowing an individual under 18 to use the website in any way, You agree to provide us on request with the required consent in a format to be determined by Us at our absolute discretion.
Invalidity
28.1 If any part of these Terms and Conditions is unenforceable (including any provision in which We exclude our liability to You) the enforceability of any other part of these conditions will not be affected.
Privacy
29.1 You acknowledge and agree to be bound by the terms of our
Privacy Policy
.
Third party rights
30.1 Except for our affiliates, directors, employees or representatives, a person who is not a party to this agreement has no right under the United Kingdom Contracts (Rights of Third Parties) Act 1999 to enforce any term of this agreement but this does not affect any right or remedy of a third party that exists or is available apart from that Act.
Entire agreement
31.1 These Terms and Conditions, together with our current Website prices, delivery details, contact details and privacy policy, set out the whole of our agreement relating to the supply of the Services to You by Us.
Waiver
32.1 No delay or failure by Twinkl to exercise any of its powers, rights or remedies under this agreement shall operate as a waiver of them nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such powers, rights or remedies preclude any other or further exercise of them. Any waiver, to be effective, must be in writing.
Governing law
33.1 The contract between us shall be governed by and interpreted in accordance with English law and the English courts shall have jurisdiction to resolve any disputes between us.
33.2 Your use of this Website and any dispute arising out of such use of the Website is subject to the laws of England and Wales and You hereby consent to this jurisdiction.
Twinkl Membership for Schools
34.1 Twinkl School Membership accounts are also subject to our
Schools Terms and Conditions.
Learner Login
(formerly known as Twinkl Assessment)
35.1 By using Learner Login (formerly known as Twinkl Assessment) as an Individual Member, you agree not to enter any personally identifiable information of yourself or anyone else. In particular, you agree to use nicknames or aliases as your user identifiers and not actual names. You also agree to inform anyone using as Learner Login associated with your account not to enter any personally identifiable information. If you or one of your learners does enter personally identifiable information, you agree to delete it immediately.
35.2 For those using Learner Login (formerly known as Twinkl Assessment) under a School Membership account, their use is governed by the data protection agreement contained within the Schools Terms and Conditions.
Twinkl Subscription Offers and Competitions
36.1 All competitions or offers coordinated by Twinkl on official social media accounts will make clear what any offer includes, who is able to participate, how to participate and when said competitions begins and ends. Any entries that do not meet these requirements will not be entered in to any promotion.
36.2 Promotions by Twinkl staff will give specific restrictions and conditions of entry for each offer in the launching of any competition. Twinkl staff operating the promotions will be available to answer questions and clarify the terms of entry for any potential entries.
36.3 Any given conditions of entry will be made clear before or at the time of entry for prize draws, discount opportunities or offer codes. These conditions will remain accessible through the period of the promotion.
Image Library (www.twinkl.com/illustration)
37.1 Your use of the Image Library is subject to the following:
37.2 You may not host more than 5 images using the link hosting option without prior written approval of Twinkl's CEO.
37.3 If you host an image on your site, you must provide credit for the image to www.twinkl.com and the owner as Twinkl Ltd.
37.4 All usage of the link hosting option and any usage of Twinkl artwork must be non-commercial without prior written approval of Twinkl's CEO.
Contacting us if there is a problem -
If you have any concerns about your membership, the website or our resources or if you would like to make a complaint, please contact the TwinklCares team at TwinklCares@twinkl.co.uk. We will endeavour to respond to all concerns within 24 hours.
Website Credit
39.1 This clause 39 applies to: a) promotional rewards added to your account by Twinkl; and b) promotional rewards given in relation to any promotional or other offer for ‘Twinkl Credit’ as set out on the landing or offer page or email for such offer, (
Twinkl Credit
).
39.2 Twinkl Credit is only available to customers in the UK. All Twinkl Credit shall be issued in GBP.
39.3 Twinkl Credit may only be redeemed against an order for an annual Ultimate Twinkl subscription plan placed through the ‘My Credit’ page of the Website.
39.4 By redeeming Twinkl Credit against an order, you agree that if you receive a refund against that order, that Twinkl Credit shall not be available for re-use and shall not be refunded in any other manner.
39.5 If you are eligible to use or redeem Twinkl Credit in accordance with this clause 39, you may view the balance of your Twinkl Credit in the ‘My Credit’ page of the Website.
39.6 Twinkl Credit: a) is not redeemable for cash or any other balance; b) may not be used in conjunction with any other promotional offer; c) may not be transferred or assigned; and d) may only be used and redeemed in accordance with this clause 39.
39.7 Twinkl may, at its sole discretion: a) withdraw, revoke or amend the Twinkl Credit reward available or issued in relation to any promotional or other offer; b) revoke any or all Twinkl Credit; or c) close its Twinkl Credit programme, in any case without notice.
Prize Promotion General Terms and Conditions
1. THESE GENERAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS
1.1 These general terms and conditions (‘the General Terms’) are the overarching general terms and conditions that apply to all competitions and prize draws promoted by Twinkl Ltd (‘the Promotion’).
1.2 Each Promotion will also have its own specific terms and conditions such as the details of how to enter, opening/closing dates, eligibility criteria, and the kind of prize you may win (‘the Specific Terms’).
1.3 You should read these General Terms in combination with the relevant set of Specific Terms. Where the Specific Terms conflict with these General Terms, the Specific Terms will take precedence.
1.4 We may change these General Terms at any time. You should check this page regularly for any changes. Any changes will apply from the date that they are uploaded.
1.5 By entering a Promotion you agree that you will be legally bound by these General Terms and any applicable Specific Terms.
2. IDENTITY OF THE PROMOTER OF THE COMPETITION
2.1 The promoter of a competition or prize draw is the person who is responsible for running it. Unless any Specific Terms tell you otherwise, the promoter of the Promotion will be Twinkl Ltd, a company registered in England and Wales under number 07201458 whose registered office is at Wards Exchange, 197 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, England, S11 8HW (‘we’, ‘our’, ‘us’). You should contact us in the first place if you have any issues or problems in relation to a Promotion. You can write to us at our registered office address or by email at legal@twinkl[dot]co[dot]uk if you have any concern relating to any Promotion, setting out clearly which Promotion and your issue.
2.2 In addition, certain Promotions may provide entrants with additional methods of contacting us, for example posting on a Facebook group or tweeting on a Twitter feed. In these cases, you may also use this method to contact us.
3. COMPETITION ELIGIBILITY RULES
3.1 Unless stated otherwise in the applicable Specific Terms, entrants to our Promotions must be aged 18 or over and must be resident in the UK.
3.2 You may not enter a Promotion if you are:
a) our employee or an employee of our holding or subsidiary companies;
b) an employee of one of our content partners, agents or suppliers who are professionally connected with the Promotion or its administration; or
c) a member of the immediate family or household of a) or b) above.
3.3 Certain Promotions may have additional eligibility requirements, such as a current subscription to our services or a requirement to be engaged in a specified profession. Any such additional eligibility requirements will be stated in the applicable Specific Terms.
3.4 Where a Promotion is open to children (aged 15 or younger) and/or young persons (aged 16 or 17), the age requirements will be stated in the applicable Specific Terms. We may require that the parent or guardian of any person aged under 18 confirms in writing that he/she agrees to be bound by all terms and conditions applicable to the relevant Promotion and will accept any prize on behalf of a prize winner who is under 18.
3.5 We will decide, in our sole discretion, whether any eligibility requirement has or has not been met and we may require evidence or confirmation from entrants at any time before awarding prizes.
4. ENTRY AND ENTRY METHODS
4.1 By online form: Where entry is by filling in and submitting an online form, you will need a device capable of accessing the internet and the form for the applicable Promotion. Online form entries are deemed to be received upon submission confirmation. Entries submitted in this way must be completed with all required details in full as specified in the Specific Terms or indicated with an asterisk (“*”) next to the fillable field of the form. Entries which fail to provide the required details will be void.
4.2 By social media: Where entry is via social media, you will need a device capable of accessing the internet and, depending on the platform on which the Promotion is run, an account for the applicable social media service.
Unless otherwise stated in the Specific Terms, for:
a) a competition requiring a social media post to be posted for entry, the entry will be deemed to be received when and only if the social media post is visible to the public or all members of the group in which it is posted; or
b) a competition requiring a message to be sent to us via social media, the entry will be deemed to be received when the message is received by us.
4.3 By post: Where you enter by post, you must place your entry postcard containing your email address, phone number, name, and any other details specified in the Specific Terms inside an envelope. You may post the entry by any second or first class method of postage. Postal entries must arrive at least one week before the draw date specified in the Specific Terms. Entries not received inside an envelope, later than one week before the draw date, or which are incomplete will not be counted. We will not return any postal entries.
4.4 Deficient Entries: In all Promotions, we reserve the right to reject any entries that are inaudible, incomplete, incomprehensible, damaged or otherwise deficient. We also reserve the right to reject entries that are unlawful, indecent, racist, inflammatory, defamatory or which we consider to be otherwise harmful to the goodwill and reputation of us or our brands. We accept no responsibility for any late, lost or misdirected entries, including but not limited to posts, messages, emails, or online form submissions not received due to technical disruptions, network congestion, spoilage, or any other reason.
4.5 Automated Entry: The use of any automated entry software or any other mechanical or electronic means (in any case otherwise than administered by us as part of the Promotion) that permits any person to enter any Promotion repeatedly is prohibited.
4.6 Names: Entrants must enter Promotions using their legal names. We reserve the right to disqualify any entrant who uses multiple names and to require them to return any prize they may have won.
4.7 Multiple Entries: Unless otherwise permitted pursuant to any Specific Terms, no person may enter a particular Promotion more than once and persons may not enter a Promotion as part of a syndicate or on behalf of any other person, syndicate, group, society or company.
5. PRIZES
5.1 The prize for each Promotion will be as stated in the Specific Terms. We reserve in all cases the right to replace the stated prize with a prize that we consider to be of broadly equivalent value. We offer no cash alternative for non-cash prizes and prize winners must accept prizes in the form offered.
5.2 Unless otherwise stated in the applicable Specific Terms, all prize winners will be notified that they have won a prize within twenty eight (28) days of the closing date of the Promotion either by email or social media message.
5.3 Prizes will be dispatched to the prize winners via the UK mail service unless otherwise stated in the applicable Specific Terms or if the prize is a cash prize. Prizes will be delivered to addresses within the UK only. If a prize winner’s contact details change, it is their responsibility to notify us. We will not be liable for any prizes which are lost, delayed, or damaged in the post for reasons beyond our control.
5.4 If the prize is a cash prize, the winner will be required to provide UK bank details to us within 7 days of our requesting these by contacting the winner. If the winner fails to provide this information within this time, we reserve the right to choose an alternative prize winner or not issue the prize at all.
5.5 We reserve the right to request proof of a prize winner’s identity and age in the form of a passport or driver’s licence and proof of address in the form of a recent utility bill. In the event that a prize winner cannot provide us with such proof, in a form reasonably acceptable to us, we may withdraw the prize and select another prize winner.
5.6 All prizes are subject to availability, are non-transferable and non-exchangeable.
5.7 If a prize winner does not take any element of a prize at the time stipulated by us (or any relevant third party prize provider) then that element of the prize will be forfeited by the prize winner. No cash will be awarded in lieu of that prize or any part of it.
5.8 Any tax payable as a result of a prize being awarded or received will be the responsibility of the prize winner. Winners should seek independent financial advice prior to accepting a prize if this is a concern and should not rely on any information provided in the Promotion to this effect.
5.9 We make no representation or warranty in relation to prizes provided and to the fullest extent permitted by law we shall have no liability to you in relation to any prize, including but not limited to its fitness for purposes. We reserve the right to disqualify entrants from entering our Promotions or prize winners from receiving their prizes where any such person engages in unsafe, illegal, unsociable or inappropriate behaviour or whose conduct is contrary to the spirit or intention of the Promotion.
5.10 No additional, further or other costs or expenses are included in any prize unless stated in the applicable Specific Terms.
5.11 Third party suppliers of prizes may stipulate their own terms, conditions or restrictions and all prize winners agree to be bound by these in addition to these General Terms and the applicable Specific Terms. Subject to paragraph 14 below, we shall have no liability in relation to any prize provided by a third party provider.
6. UNCLAIMED PRIZES
6.1 All prizes must be claimed within twenty-one (21) days of our notification of winning or as otherwise stated in any Specific Terms. We reserve the right to award prizes unclaimed after this period to alternative prize winners or not to award them at all.
6.2 If you contact us in any way to claim a prize from a different email address/social media account, you must provide us with and confirm your contact details, otherwise we may be unable to contact you and validate your winning the prize and you may as a result forfeit your prize.
7. PUBLICITY AND PERSONAL INFORMATION
7.1 The personal information supplied by entrants when entering our Promotions will be used by us in accordance with our Privacy Policy, available at https://www.twinkl.co.uk/legal#privacy-policy. By entering any Promotion, you consent to such processing and you warrant that all data provided by you is accurate.
7.2 If you are required to submit a third party’s personal information as a part of entry into or participation in any Promotion, you must ensure that any other person whose details have been provided by the entrant to us has given their consent for their details to be provided to us and to be contacted by us in relation to the relevant Promotion.
7.3 If you are the winner of a Promotion, you agree that we may use your name, image and town and/or county of residence to announce the winner of such Promotion and for any other reasonable and related promotional purposes. You further agree and acknowledge that publicity materials featuring you may be provided to our third party prize providers for the purposes of promoting their association with the Promotion and for awarding the relevant prizes.
7.4 No fees shall be payable to any entrant in relation to their entry in any Promotion.
8. PHOTOGRAPHS AND VIDEOS
If any Promotion requires you to submit a photograph or video clip as a part of entry into or participation in the Promotion (collectively, ‘the Photograph’):
8.1 you warrant that you are the person in the Photograph or have prior approval from the person in the Photograph (or that person’s parent or legal guardian, if the person in the Photograph is under 18) for it to be submitted as part of your entry;
8.2 you agree that we have the right to publish and communicate to the public the Photograph in any media at all times without restriction or limitation throughout the world for any purpose;
8.3 you acknowledge that we may edit the Photograph in our sole discretion;
8.4 you agree that we have the right to use your name, likeness and other personal information in conjunction with the Photograph;
8.5 you agree not to bring against us any actions, suits, claims or demands in respect of defamation or any infringement or violation of any personal and/or property rights of any sort from our use of your Photograph;
8.6 you unconditionally waive your right to seek or obtain an injunction to prevent or restrict our use of the Photograph; and
8.7 entrants aged under 18 shall have obtained the consent of a parent or a guardian (and will provide us with the contact details we need should we wish to verify this).
9. PRIZE DRAWS
9.1 Where any prize is awarded via a prize draw, prize winners will be chosen at random from all qualifying entries within thirty (30) days of the Promotion closing date, unless stated otherwise in the Specific Terms.
9.2 If we become aware that the same person has been selected as a prize winner more than once in the same Promotion, that person will win one prize only and we may draw another prize winner at our discretion.
10. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
10.1 By entering a Promotion you hereby:
10.1.1 assign to us all rights (including present and future copyright) in and to your Promotion entry in all media and whether in existence now or created in the future;
10.1.2 agree not to assert any “moral rights” in respect of your Promotion entry (wherever and whenever such rights are recognised) against us, our assigns, licensees and successors in title;
10.1.3 undertake to us that your Promotion entry: (a) is not in breach of any third party rights; and (b) does not contain anything which is defamatory, indecent, harassing or threatening; and
10.1.4 confirm that you have the full right, power and authority to grant the rights set out above and that you have obtained all consents and permissions necessary to grant to us the same.
10.2 All rights in and to the name and title of each Promotion and the format of the Promotion are our sole property and we may exploit the same in our absolute discretion.
11. PROCESS FAILURES AND OTHER MATTERS
If a Promotion is not capable of running as planned for any reason (including but not limited to as a result of any technical failures, unauthorised intervention, computer virus, mobile network failure, tampering, fraud or any other causes beyond our control which corrupt or affect the administration, security, fairness, integrity or proper conduct of such Promotion), we reserve the right to cancel, terminate, modify or suspend the Promotion and/or any prize draw(s) or judging related to the Promotion and/or to disqualify any individual who (whether directly or indirectly) causes the problem.
12. DECISIONS
12.1 All our decisions relating to Promotions and/or redemption of prizes are final. No discussions or correspondence with entrants or any other person will be entered into in this regard.
12.2 Tiebreakers, disputes, conflicts, questions or concerns will be managed by us and, if required by law, by an independent adjudicator.
12.3 Where a Promotion involves voting, the accuracy of the results will be final and binding and no correspondence will be entered into in this regard.
13. FAILURE TO ENFORCE GENERAL TERMS
A failure by us to enforce these General Terms, any Specific Terms, or any part thereof in either case in any instance(s) will not give rise to a claim or right of action by any entrant or prize winner, nor shall it be deemed a waiver of any of our rights in relation to the same.
14. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1 Except as specifically set out herein and to the maximum extent permitted by law, all conditions, warranties and representations expressed or implied by law are hereby excluded.
14.2 To the fullest extent permitted by law, we hereby exclude and shall not have any liability to any entrant or prize winner in connection with or arising out of any Promotion howsoever caused, including for any costs, expenses, forfeited prizes, damages and other liabilities, provided that nothing herein shall operate so as to limit or exclude our liability for personal injury or death caused by our negligence. For the avoidance of doubt, this paragraph shall also apply in respect of any prize provided by a third party provider.
14.3 In the event that any provision of these General Terms and/or any Specific Terms are held to be illegal, invalid, void or otherwise unenforceable, such provisions shall be severed from the remaining provisions, which shall continue in full force and effect.
15. GENERAL
15.1 If there is any reason to believe that there has been a breach of the General Terms or Specific Terms, we may, at our sole and absolute discretion, exclude an entrant from participating in the Promotion and require the return or reimbursement of any prize where such prize has been awarded to such entrant.
15.2 We may vary the terms of, or terminate, a Promotion at any time at our absolute discretion without liability to any entrant or other person. We will not award any prize if the Promotion is terminated.
Call Recordings Privacy Notice
Introduction
This notice is in addition to the
General Privacy Policy
. In the event that the Twinkl Call Recordings Privacy Notice conflicts with the General Privacy Policy, then the latter will prevail.
This privacy notice applies to telephone calls recorded by Twinkl Ltd. When a caller telephones Twinkl Ltd, the call is recorded. Such a call may contain personal data.
What is the purpose and legal grounds of call recordings?
The purpose of call recordings is to provide you with the best customer service possible. Best customer service possible means that we record your calls for:
training and quality services;
providing a record of your complaints or issues to investigate and rectify; and
ensuring our staff’s own security from abusive or mischievous calls
To use call recordings for the purposes described, we’ll rely on a condition known as legitimate interests, unless those interests are overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the participants in the call.  You may therefore object to this processing if you think that your legitimate interests outweigh ours.
Who does Twinkl share call recordings with?
The call recordings may be shared with the following:
The Twinkl group of companies on a worldwide basis.
Third parties who deliver this service to you
Other third parties by law
How long does Twinkl retain call recordings?
We will retain calls for 18 months. However, this retention period may be extended if we need to rely on those recordings for legal proceedings.
What calls are recorded?
Calls which are recorded are: all inbound calls to Twinkl Customer and School Accounts team/helpdesks.
All callers are advised that calls will be recorded as part of a pre-recorded welcome message before being connected to Twinkl Ltd. The message states:
“Welcome to Twinkl Cares!  Just to let you know we record our calls to help us provide you with the best service possible. Don't want your call recorded? Email us at twinklcares@twinkl.com instead. Otherwise just stay on the line and we'll be with you soon.”
The message is followed by a beep/tone to indicate that the recording has started. The recording automatically stops when the caller disconnects from the call. You provide your agreement to the call recording by staying on the line after the pre-welcome message.
How can I contact Twinkl if I do not want to be recorded?
You may contact us by an alternative means such as mail or email.
Email:
 twinklcares@twinkl.co.uk or schools@twinkl.co.uk
Postal Address: Twinkl Global HQ, Wards Exchange, 197 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, S11 8HW, UK
Where are call recordings stored?
Call recordings are stored by our Data Processor, on Zendesk Cloud Servers. We hold the appropriate legal documentation, as required by current data protection laws.
We may also download copies and store your call recordings on our encrypted servers for the purposes listed in this notice and for evidence in any legal proceedings.
Can I request a copy of a recording?
You may request a copy of a recorded telephone conversation, verbally or in writing. However, if we cannot verify your identity, we may request further identity information which may only be provided via further written communication. Only after obtaining all the relevant information to identify you, will we provide your recorded voice recordings within the current legal time frame of 1 month.
As with most subject access requests, there will be no fee for providing your information. However, we may charge a reasonable fee for the administrative costs of complying with a request if it is manifestly unfounded or excessive or if you require further copies of the data following a request.
When requesting a copy of a recorded telephone conversation please provide details to successfully identify you, the date and time of the call, if possible, in order to provide your information as quickly as possible to you (see the example below).
Call recording request form
Full name
Email address registered with your account
Username
Postal address
Month and Year  of  joining Twinkl
Date and time of call if possible
Date                               Approx Time
Format of data
WAV, MP3, CD-Rom, Transcript,
(Please delete unwanted options)
Data to be sent to….
Postal address/email
(Please delete unwanted options)
We have up to 30 days from the date of receipt of a valid and authenticated request but if you can provide the date range and the time of your call recording, we will be able to respond to your request more quickly.
A permanent copy of the recording will be provided in a format that Twinkl can reasonably expect the enquirer will be able to use; taking account of the enquirer’s preference (if any), practicality and cost of preparation. Formats could include WAV, MP3, other digital format or a transcript.
Please submit your request via email or to the postal address as above: twinklcares@twinkl.co.uk  or schools@twinkl.co.uk
Alternatively, use the contact information on our contact us page.
Will there be changes to this call recording policy?
Our Call Recording Policy may change from time to time due to changes in how we operate our business or in the UK legislation governing call recording. We will amend any changes to our Call Recording Policy on this page.
What are my rights?
Please refer to our General Privacy Policy.
What if I have concerns regarding Twinkl Ltd’s call recording policy?
If you have any concerns about this policy and your data protection rights, please contact the DPO at dpo@twinkl.co.uk
We will undertake to resolve directly with you any concerns that you may have. Should we not be able to,  then the matter can be addressed to the Information Commissioner’s Office at Wycliffe House, Water Lane, Wilmslow, Cheshire, SK9 5AF. Telephone number: 0303 123 1113.
Product Service Terms
Please read the following important terms and conditions before you subscribe to any physical product service on our website and check that they contain everything you want and nothing that you are not willing to agree to.
In this contract:
‘
Twinkl
’, ‘
we
’, ‘
us
’, or ‘
our
’ means Twinkl Ltd, a company incorporated in England and Wales under company number 07201458 and whose registered office is at Wards Exchange, 197 Ecclesall Road, Sheffield, England, S11 8HW; and
‘
you
’ or ‘
your
’ means the person using our site to buy goods from us.
If you have any questions about this contract or any orders you have placed, please contact us by sending an email to our Twinkl Cares team at
twinklcares@twinkl.co.uk
.
Introduction
Twinkl sells physical goods subscriptions separately from its premium membership subscriptions. Each of these is a ‘
Product Service
’.
For each Product Service, one or more physical goods (each a ‘
Product
’) is provided to you separately at regular intervals as specified for that Product Service. Each Product is paid for separately by you before dispatch of the Product.
The ‘
Price
’ you pay for each Product is as specified on the Product Service page or as altered and notified to you from time to time.
When you subscribe to a Product Service on our website, you agree to be legally bound by these terms and conditions. The minimum duration of your subscription for a Product Service is one Product.
By subscribing to a Product Service, you also agree to be bound by:
our website terms and conditions and any documents referred to in them, including without limitation our privacy policy (see twinkl.co.uk/legal);
extra terms which may add to, or replace some of, this contract. This may happen for security, legal, regulatory, or other reasonable reasons. We will contact you to let you know if we intend to do this by giving you one month’s notice. If you do not agree to these changes, you can end this contract at any time by giving notice under these terms and conditions in accordance with clause 5; and
specific terms which apply to certain Product Services. These are detailed on the relevant webpage for the Product Service as updated from time to time.
All of the documents in clause 1.5 form part of this contract as though set out in full here. If there is a conflict between the website terms and conditions and these terms and conditions, these terms and conditions will apply to that extent.
We may change any of the terms of this contract, including the Price, at any time by giving you reasonable notice in advance of payment being taken for a Product. If you are not happy with such change, you can end the contract in accordance with clause 5.
Information we give you
By law, the Consumer Contracts (Information, Cancellation and Additional Charges) Regulations 2013 say that we must give you certain key information before a legally binding contract between you and us is made. This key information will be provided in:
these Product Service terms and conditions;
our Subscription Confirmation Email (see clause 4.4);
in relation to the Product, our Product Confirmation Email (see clause 4.7); and/or
the Product Service webpage.
You can also get access to this information by contacting us (see
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
).
The key information we give you by law forms part of this contract as though it is set out in full here.
If we have to change any key information once a legally binding contract between you and us is made, we can only do this if you agree to it.
Privacy and personal information
Our Privacy Policy is available at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/legal
as updated from time to time.
Your privacy and personal information are important to us. Any personal information that you provide to us will be dealt with in line with our Privacy Policy, which explains what personal information we collect from you, how and why we collect, store, use, and share such information, your rights in relation to your personal information and how to contact us and supervisory authorities if you have a query or complaint about the use of your personal information.
Subscribing to a Product Service
Below, we set out how a legally binding contract between you and us is made.
You place an order to subscribe for the Product Service by clicking the ‘Subscribe Now’ button on the Product Service page, entering your details, and filling in and submitting your payment details. Please read and check your order carefully before submitting it. You will be able to correct any errors before submitting your order to us.
By placing an order, you are agreeing that Twinkl will charge you, in respect of each Product, the Price at such intervals as specified for the Product Service until the contract for the Product Service is cancelled.
When you place your order to subscribe at the end of the online checkout process (e.g. when you click on the ‘Pay’ button), we will acknowledge your subscription to the Product Service by email. This is a
Subscription Confirmation Email
.
A Subscription Confirmation Email means that your order to subscribe to the Product Service has been accepted by us and you have subscribed to the Product Service. At this point, a legally binding contract will be in place between you and us.
We may send you a
Product Confirmation Email
within a reasonable time prior to our taking payment for and/or delivery of each Product.
If you are under the age of 18, you may not subscribe to any Product Service on our site.
You may not subscribe to any Product Service if you are not a consumer. If you are a business, please contact us at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
to register your interest for the Product Service.
Right to cancel
You have the right to cancel this subscription within 14 days without giving any reason.
You may cancel the subscription for the Product Service at any time provided that notice of such cancellation is received by us within the
Cancellation Period
in the relevant Product Service page.
You cannot cancel your subscription outside the Cancellation Period.
To exercise the right to cancel, you must inform us of your decision to cancel your subscription either via our website or by contacting us using a method set out here:
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
. Your contract with us for the Product Service will be cancelled from the point at which we confirm your cancellation by notifying you of this.
We may cancel your subscription for the Product Service at any time prior to delivery of any Product. We will notify you by email if this occurs and refund you for any payment made for any Product which has not been delivered.
Effects of cancellation
If you cancel this contract and you have already made a payment for a Product which you have not yet received, we will refund to you all payments received.
We will make the reimbursement using the same means of payment as you used for the Product transaction, unless you have expressly agreed otherwise.
If you have cancelled this contract after a Product has been dispatched by us or delivered to you, we may make a deduction from the reimbursement for loss in value of any goods supplied and all delivery costs.
We may withhold reimbursement until we have received the Product back.
If you have received goods:
you shall send back the goods or hand them over to us without undue delay and in any event not later than 14 days from the day on which you communicate your cancellation from this contract to us. The deadline is met if you send the goods back before the period of 14 days has expired;
you will bear the cost of returning the goods; and
you are liable for any diminished value of the goods resulting from the handling other than what is necessary to establish the nature, characteristics and functioning of the goods.
Delivery
The estimated schedule for delivery of each Product in the Product Service is set out in the Product Service page from time to time or the Subscription Confirmation Email. If there is a conflict between the Product Service page and the Subscription Confirmation Email relating to the estimated delivery schedule of the Products in the Product Service, you must contact us. We may tell you which schedule is correct for the Product Service or inform you of an alternative delivery schedule.
The estimated delivery of each Product may be set out in any Product Confirmation Email sent to you before each Product delivery (‘the
Expected Arrival Date
’). If a Product Confirmation Email is not sent to you, the Expected Arrival Date of each Product is as described in the delivery schedule in clause 7.1.
If something happens which is outside of our control, the Expected Arrival Date may be affected. We may provide you with a revised Expected Arrival Date at any time.
You will not have a right to cancel or receive a refund for non-delivery unless the product has not been delivered within a reasonable time following the month of the Expected Arrival Date.
If a Product has not been delivered by the Expected Arrival Date, you must contact us at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
. We may either arrange for a replacement Product to be delivered to you or a refund for that Product at our discretion.
Delivery will take place as the address specified by you when you placed your order with us for the Product Service. If you wish to change this address for any delivery of the ongoing Product Service, please contact us at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
.
Each Product is separate and non-delivery of one Product does not affect the contract for the remaining Products prior to cancellation of this contract.
Payment
We will do all that we reasonably can to ensure that all of the information you give us when submitting your payment details for the Product Service is secure by using an encrypted secure payment mechanism. However, in the absence of negligence on our part, any failure by us to comply with this contract or our Privacy Policy (see clause 3) or breach by us of our duties under applicable laws, we will not be legally responsible to you for any loss that you may suffer if a third party gains unauthorised access to any information that you give us.
Your payment method will be charged prior to dispatch of each Product.
If your payment is not received by us and you have already received a Product, you must:
pay for such Product as soon as possible and in any case within 30 days of receipt of the Product; or
return the Product to us as soon as possible and in any case within 30 days of receipt of the Product. If so, you must keep the Product in your possession until you return it to us, take reasonable care of it whilst it is in your possession, and not use the Product prior to returning it to us.
If you do not pay for the Product or fail to return the Product in accordance with clause 8.3, we may collect the Product from you at your expense. We will try to contact you to let you know if we intend to do this.
Nothing in this clause affects your legal rights to cancel the contract during the Cancellation Period.
Nature of the Product
The Consumer Rights Act 2015 gives you certain legal rights (also known as ‘statutory rights’). The Product(s) that we provide to you must be as described, fit for purpose and of satisfactory quality.
We are under a legal duty to supply you with Products that are in conformity with this contract.
The packaging of the Product(s) may be different from that shown on the site.
While we try to make sure that:
all weights, sizes and measurements set out on the Product Service page are as accurate as possible, there may be a small tolerance of up to 5% in such weights, sizes and measurements; and
the colours of the Product are displayed accurately on the site, the actual colours that you see on your device may vary depending on the device that you use.
End of the contract
If this contract is ended it will not affect our right to receive any money which you owe to us under this contract.
Limitation on our liability
Except for any legal responsibility that we cannot exclude in law (such as for death or personal injury) or arising under applicable laws relating to the protection of your personal information, we are not legally responsible for any:
losses that were not foreseeable to you and us when the contract was formed;
losses that were not caused by any breach on our part;
business losses; or
losses to non-consumers.
Third party rights
No one other than a party to this contract has any right to enforce any term of this contract.
Disputes
We will try to resolve any disputes with you quickly and efficiently. If you are unhappy with a Product, the Product Service, or any other matter, please contact us as soon as possible using the contact details at
https://www.twinkl.co.uk/contact-us
The laws of England and Wales apply to this contract. Any disputes will be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of England and Wales.
You don't have to sign out unless you're on a shared or public computer.
Sign Out Anyway
Stay Signed In
Help
Cookie preferences
🍪
Twinkl uses cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalised content and analyse traffic.
Get more info or click 'Accept' to consent to our
policy
defined use of cookies.
We use cookies and similar technologies to enhance your experience on our website. Cookies help us to understand how you interact with our site, personalize content, and provide you with a more tailored browsing experience. By continuing to use our site, you agree to the use of cookies as outlined in this notice.
Cookies are small text files stored on your device when you visit a website. They allow the site to remember your preferences, login information, and other settings to make your experience more convenient. Cookies can also help us analyse website traffic and improve the performance and security of our site.
You can manage or disable cookies through your browser settings at any time. However, please be aware that disabling cookies may affect your experience on our website and limit the functionality available to you.
Manage cookies
Accept all cookies
Hear us out
👋
At Twinkl, your trust means everything to us. That's why we respect your privacy, protect it with commercial encryption and ensure that there are strict policies that govern how all data is handled.
Read more from Jon our CEO...
Necessary Cookies:
Cookies to ensure the correct technical functionality of the services we provide. Required.
Analytic Cookies:
Cookies used to understand the site traffic, user activity and for advertising. Click to toggle or read more in our
cookie policy
.
On
Off
Necessary cookies only
Save custom preferences